Thanks for the link, but, as written in the review, the bottelneck is in DMI. I was hoping on x299 with PCI-E 16x, the bottleneck would be dropped. I don't know if VROC is necessary to do that though.
"But if you get a mortgage you can invest the rest!"
Brfxxccxxmnpcccclllmmnprxvclmnckssqlbb11116
Always the first.
&gt; 30  List them
&gt; Nice to meet you!  &gt; I am Aiko Yamaide, who graduated from the limited-to-growth-period unit Sakura Gakuin in March.  &gt; From today, I'll be tweeting everyday various things!!  &gt; From here, let's get to know each other well.  &gt; \#YamaideAiko   &gt; \#OfferYourSupport   &gt; \#SakuraGakuin   &gt; \#2017NendoGraduate
Letting that dude get 6 was a big mistake by Loyola
HAAha tryHard
What Cintiq model do you have? Generally speaking, if your computer doesn't have a USB-C port, then you'll need to use Wacom link to connect it to your Cintiq. You can't use USB-C Directly here.
Set times tonight:  7pm - Ellevator 8pm - Matthew Good 9:30pm - Our Lady Peace
Looks so good 
**SMITH**:   Sir, he made a chimney in my father's house, and   the bricks are alive at this day to testify it;   therefore deny it not.
And then we find out that it was some sort of elaborate scheme for April Fools Day.
Completely falling apart. This is sad to watch 
You can lube ‘em? Lubed linears are always nice. Try it on one switch, see how you like it. 
It’s like the halo of first person shooters, when the crosshair isn’t centered. 
Blah blah blah booze is good for you  Source: in the wine biz for the last 22 years. 
Ugg boots.
Photo credit Maxwellcreative Photography.
Yeah Ive been doing them for years and never thought of it until it got asked this morning.  I guess my only last thought is I thought fundraising had to involve registered charities but I might have that wrong then.
I'd love to see how kids who grow up on those two shows turn out...  "What do you mean it's actually called Hollywood??"
&gt; Because America is a melting pot  ... yes, out of many one. Are we one? No.
Hey @Newhoustonguy, I emailed you about a scammer with proof attached. I don't know his Reddit username but I attached his email, is that ok/enough?
Reminds me of how hurtful Peter was to Uncle Ben in the original Spider-Man film.
And struggling to open them with her long nails
When you hire someone mainly for a combination of their looks and their willingness to say whatever needs to be said, don't be surprised when they turn out to be incompetent.
Mmm, sounds like a bit of projection there matey.
I’m hoping as hard as I can
Maybe we can drink the water then 
I'm still putting you on the list.
"Come on Ramblers!"  Man this truTV broadcast is cringe as fuck.
Who said that? Op is talking about punishing animals by killing them after they’ve killed somebody.
One more photo here: https://imgur.com/a/rfxk9  Watered when the soil is dry, roughly once or twice a week. With Miracle Gro fertilizer dissolved in.   Sits on a north-facing bay window and gets a "fair amount" of direct sun.   Humidifier is running in the room.   Any thoughts on how we can fix this? Is it bugs? Fertilizer issues? Overwatering? Underwatering?
**Hey /u/RapTiiC. Thank you for requesting a Pokémon at /r/PokemonCreate.**  *Please take note of a few things:*  * **Removing your submission may result in a ban.**  * **If your Pokémon is not found by the sender, you will have a 12 hour timeframe to re-deposit.**  * **TID/SID checks may only be done at our [discord server.](https://discord.gg/cTmXbRv)**  #**If we make a mistake, please let us know!**  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/PokemonCreate) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Are you thinking of the one in the orchard at the pumpkin farm?
The man in black fled across the desert and the gunslinger followed.  Opening line in Dark Tower, really hooked 15 year old me  Edit: why is this being downvoted? 
https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/87j3za/glad_hogg_did_something_for_backpack_reform/?utm_source=reddit-android  I posted this 4 days ago... still a good meme
Ugh, I'm gonna try to make this one day and I'm gonna end up with a piece of shit
Fries and Ice Cream (sometimes nuggets too)
I remember learning about the turtle boats from Age of Empires II lol. I learned so many little tidbits about the world through that game.
It has blown out of proportion, because of the mess that the mods did. If they wanted to cover it up, they did the worst job they could ever do. Literally the opposite. Now imagine they leave all the threads and delete all the duplicates. It wouldn't be "that controversial". Good job mods :) you got punished too
Why not pay it before the due date?
More like Dessert (eagle)
When a horse breaks it's leg, the humane things is to shoot it, but when a dog loses all 4, we keep it alive. 
First ace..pink disc...
Netflix has the Rapture series
I'd love to try a two bath BW developer like Diafine, ADX II or one of the Moersch ones. Any recommendations or experiences? 
"Now if you'll excuse me, I have to go beat a God senseless" has got to be one of my favorites.
I really don't get why Jessica acts like she has the high ground whenever she calls Trish and Malcolm out on their drug addictions.  She's not a drug addict, but she sure as hell is as hooked on alcohol as Malcolm was in fucking and Trish was on getting powers this season.  Well, maybe not as bad as Trish, she was a hot mess the entire season.
I have two STMs, been using them exclusively for over a year. Not a single leak.
He clearly did not mean it in a racist way
Thunder, game 7, conference finals 2016
So does my wife
Hahahaha you're still stuck
345 hours in and almost have all ops that arnt the newest 2 (got season pass for them)
eating at the chillest restaurants .
This was the greatest video ever. Bunch of hypocrites.
When the love of my life told me he loved me the first time (I cried) and every time since.  
That too
They breathalyze before and after
I would have snatched her phone and threw it very far out the window onto the sidewalk.
You have a really nicely body, very cute body hair and very toned. Damn you’re cute and now I’m just jealous 😛
Two dicks in the same butthole
2016*
I mean they say that but in the flashback before his imprisonment he acts exactly the same 
I wonder how this works with lovers. Unfortunately unlike friendships i feel theres probably a break point were too much time leads to decreased connection 
I remember a little while ago there were some polls showing the political leanings of the older members of generation z. They were described as Socially Liberal and Physically Conservative with small government and low taxes being a priority and more religious than millennials. Conservatives were celebrating how millennials were apparently an off generation and that the next batch of voters would support a center-right America while the alt-right lunatics claimed that they were the ones who would see the truth and fight hard for nationalism.   Well they shit the bed with that didn’t they? As a member of gen z, I can safely say that while my peers (particularly white guys) may lean to the right on certain economic issues, most people are very socially liberal. We are incredibly diverse and open and accepting to people of all backgrounds. We have grown up with mass shootings and want some common sense reforms now. Young people see trump and the rest of the gop for what they are. Maybe if the party had attempted to be more moderate, they would have won people over. Maybe if they had some meaningful conversation instead of constantly relying on lying and insults, people would have been more willing to hear what they have to say. Maybe if they gave a shit about the people they represent instead of giving into relentless greed and fanatical religious devotion, people would trust them. But no, instead of courting younger voters, the gop he has done everything in their power to alienate them. 
I graduate in May and I'm not looking forward to it. I'll likely be making good money as a nurse but still it's stressful to think about. 
This is the first time I've seen someone use an emoji on Reddit 
More people might like it then dislike it, but that’s what I think they’re gonna do. I feel like they’re gonna have it destroyed for one day (April fools) to see how everyone would like it, i don’t think they thought tilted would affect the game this much, so they are going to see what it would change and how everyone would like it.
Well done! More Sayori pictures = good
I'm 25 and would like to finish my highschool. I live in Edmonton Alberta. Can anyone help me please?
Oh
I guess it just depends on where you live. In my area, the public high schools are pretty great and so are the private schools, but they’re $6-8k a year.
Lots of mild jerseys in the house tonight. 
Oof that Native American one...
Britain didn't withdraw from the Republic because we asked nicely.  Unlike the kneelers in Scotland and Wales we never stopped throwing up rebellions.  Sometimes just enduring to fight another day is enough.
https://www.tvinsider.com/195068/sinclair-tribune-merger-wgn-local-news/
I made 100k straight out and am up to $150k total comp after 3 years. Not everyone can do it, but if you think it’s impossible you’re fooling yourself.
But its not funny though.
This may not be a retro pay... Who knows. I got $1,000 (net) on my last pay, above the amount I am getting paid that is too low. I checked and they put three periods that with my "regular" pay gives me $6,000+ but the gross amount is closer to $5,000... I may not have a PhD in mathematics but how am I supposed to know what the proper amount was... And the description doesn't help much, they put dates that are different than what my situation is. It is so messed up I would have to sit down with someone from compensation for a full day and go through years of pay stubs and I am not sure we could figure it out...
How many do you think I’ll have to do? 
Yeah incest and all that but like...Thomas looks like his dad, Lucie looks like her mom but with straight hair, Daniel look like...umm? 
Cool. We'll give it a few more tries then knock it on the head. I don't want to waste your time.
I’m with you on this. This was all I got tagged in when I first got a Facebook.
I like the leaded gasoline hypothesis.  https://www.motherjones.com/environment/2016/02/lead-exposure-gasoline-crime-increase-children-health/
There are 2 reasons I thought you were Grace Helbig
Cambridge, huh? I always thought he had a London accent. Who knew!
Its never the half decent people that you have to get to that point with, though.
[....Woah](https://media.giphy.com/media/8g4CuR1Af5t6g/giphy.gif)
Bring it on!
As if it matters. She's leading a charge to disarm civilians while wearing the flag of a country that slaughtered citizens that it had disarmed. It's a little bit too on the nose.  She might as well be wearing a jacket with a patch that reads "after we take your guns, we're going to f****** kill you."
Oh I was just writing how I speak. I'll make sure to do that. I did advanced English for 2 years and I'm in ap English now. Thanks so much !
I remember when the metro stars change their name to the red bulls. Their very first game as the red bulls was at DC United. The DC fans had a big sign “new name,same lame”.   This reminds me of that. 
Also the Two ppl were "injured" on the show could be greened too, since the interview says "me and Blair St. Clair"
Please check this picture: https://imgur.com/a/BXm3b  Also, thanks for the LC!
How do you do that? 
I would have to assume so. I contacted the venue to complain, because the two supports sounded fine. The venue told me that the sound guy was with the band :-/
This movie is a ton of fun. It fingered all of my memberberries and I loved it. 
Your ethics are...
What orientation are you trying to print it in
Well whatever pal.
Scurry Turry
nice cropping sir
We are not.
I'm not implying that you are one of the reddit crybabies, I'm pointing out that lots of crybabies making threads, doesn't make their crying valid, which is what you suggested.  I get it just fine. Maybe that's why I don't have a problem with it.  No, it hasn't gone over my head. You implied that I said nerfing can never be the correct decision. I never said that. I just said it wasn't the correct decision here. My pointing out your strawman doesn't mean I don't understand it, on the contrary. The tank hunter is not too effective at everything. It's too effective against the planes, and EVERYTHING is too effective against planes. This doesn't suggest nerfing the TH, it suggests buffing the other planes. The problem here is not one plane being too good.
Reliable but expect s longer drive than you'd normally make. Bring entertainment 
What’s too bad is most of these mistakes have been self destructive and not forced by Michigan
Much better already.
They make a shit ton of money off adaptors,  hubs and converters.  It's why they always have to come out with some kind of new connector that no one else uses.  "Alright everyone has PS2 ports?  Great,  ADB only bitch!" "oh finally got all your devices USB huh?  Fuck that, it's USB-c now... or is it?  Nope,  going with lightning ports now haha!  Headphone jack?  Please, don't make me laugh." "Now that you have the latest cables,  you should be all set.. Did I mention we removed all the ports on the new Macbook Pro except for one,  which is also for the power source?  Thats right,  everything is fucking wireless now... But we can sell you this 4-port adaptor for $99.95"
Upvote. 
Atta boi
Hopefully Kruk doesn't do his own taxes 
Yes that April 1st time stamp is suspicious. 
Seconding moen/Kohler. Both are great at taking a beating (from high pressure and hard water) and have a million trim options.
LOL! It's mostly independent living. If they want to trim their nose hairs, with a dagger, no one is stopping them.  If they want to die, close to the end of the month, then their family must scramble to get their unit cleared out or pay another $3,500.00 rent.
4am delivery was on time that day.
Great space! However, I did have to zoom in a little to realize that was a tree and not just terrible cable management! Haha
Misleading titles are an essential part of karma farming, almost as important as reposting ! 
Ice Cream With Maple Syrup on it   ^^^Yes ^^^Im ^^^Canadian
###[Not in the original vid](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=piRQkAV-_HE)
Just curious, what would happen if you received a phone and never finished the port over?
or sexist
I read that as “in his 90’s.” Felt really old for a second. Jesus.
this is setting up to be michigan winning by 11
Jesus :/ gotta love Zero Tolerance!!
[Hmmm](https://i.imgur.com/0WwpoKr.png)
[/r/onewordeach says:](https://i.imgur.com/CRIOyLa.png)
This is either cunningly layered sarcasm or a typo... text can be confusing.
The game is long and very large. Like other  jrpgs you have to be willing to commit the time to get far. Have fun playing 
I had family in the Winslow area that worked on devil's den. My grandma has pictures.  I'll have to get her to dig them out to post. 
How old are you now? Curious.
I took my PT test at Point Magu, never knew it was an old missile range 
■■■■■■■■■■■■  My opinion is that I'm objectively oyasumi-ing now.
I thought the previous one was a little too beefy to still be qualified as a "Bumper" and wanted increase compatibility with skins like dBrand, allowing for more back show off space :)
I personally think it's awful that a medical doctor doesn't respect your choice about your own life.
Does McDavid have 2 cups in 2 years? Is McDavid in the playoffs? I don’t think so baud.
&gt; AS  I'm not familiar with this?
F
Damn, this will help with the wire wearing out and becoming useless as well!!!!
In case people read attached article it is old with a bad date.  Vote is June 26th.   https://ballotpedia.org/Oklahoma_State_Question_788,_Medical_Marijuana_Legalization_Initiative_(June_2018)
lemme know when jaina stops killing innocents with her supposed neutral kirin tor army laughign as there torturing surrendering innocents   or when she never tries to flood a capital city again for revenge only to be stopped by thrall and dragons.  oh thats right  alliance is always so squeaky clean and good and is never in the wrong
He didn't instantly spec her out, what a noob.
&gt; I dislike that.  I like that.
Aaaaayyyyy D-shonquayvis!! Dat you?
That overhead view is also behind the play so it makes Zlatan look farther forward than he is. 
Love this, charcoal pencils are my favorite, that sharpening is fierce, hand cut?
No, I'm not out yet.
We are reflections of the world around us.
Where I'm at I just recently bought a bunch of S&amp;B 10mm and I got it for $0.44/round but that is only because I bought 1000 rounds. For a box of 50 the price comes to around $0.60/round.  I also bought 1000 rounds of wolf 7.62x39 and that ended up at $0.40/round because it was on sale lol.   If you are remote you can easily double those prices.
A R C E U S H Y P E
Thanks for your honesty. I’m starting to see that, although he is the one that is betraying a committed relationship, I’m aiding and abetting. 
So Ohara is using the dream theory. I don't like that theory. I prefer the everyone is fucked theory, because that means walking into a Yonko's territory has serious consequences.
In Dr Doolittle when all the animals realize that Eddie Murphy can hear them, the two sheep tell him that their butts hurt.  
Naw he's like an overly cooked Mr. Potato Head. 
I have my TV way too high up as well. Honestly if op moved it down a few inches it would be way better for his neck, higher up tho looks better imo but not practical
Why does everyone think this is a photoshopped picture
Because youre being upset over semantics and them using the wrong word. They mean ethnicity, or heritage. Ive never met a minority in Canada and thought they werent "Canadian". Theyre here arent they? Working, contributing citizen who likes the values my country holds? Sweet, theyre Canadian as far as Im concerned. There are a wide variety of reasons to be curious where someone was from.  In my opinion as a white guy, if you arent native american, the question "where are you from/whats your heritage" is fair game.  Its funny that I see reddit bitch and moan about how only white people can say "American", but simulataneously in any thread about Euro heritage whites are mocked wholesale for saying things like "Im X amount English/Dutch/german". Many of those same whites feel no special attachment to the country itself beyond recognizing their heritage.  So we are both guilty of not caring where we're from, and caring too much according to reddit.
We use a pixy camera
I'm sure after ramming a naval vessel they probably told them next time they are around they'll view the sea Shepard entering a certain radius as a hostile act and blow them out of the water. Being their whole mo is being close and annoying I imagine they wouldn't try
No. Sometimes. Not in my experience.  In nearly every instance, working out and having a great personality will get you laid more than having a big dick.    As to sex, communication and enthusiasm are WAY more important than dick size. 
It also doesn't belong there because you can't write.
Surprisingly enough, there's no age of candidacy is Vermont, so he could actually do it.
you're good. the "braun to LA" rumors have been going on for years lmao
High impact pulse with HCR? Signed up instantly.  Love that thing even more now. Range masterwork helps with keeping the grouping of shots together (or so someone on here told me, seems to work so I aint complaining).
I have nightmares of dugongs. This arg is cursed. 
A lotta luck, a little knowledge 
The ep will be all black, to watch it properly you will ned to buy the blu-ray
I am not sure this is "accidental" as I believe most of Ethiopia is still IN the Renaissance. I mean, just look at the footnote lol. Also those clothes may not be costumes.....
I'm almost certain it was. 
Lol $50,000? I wish.
Philosophical dilemmas. 
**Elite Casual** (49/50) has completed Sith T6 and is working on Heroic while earning **40 Stars** in **Territory Battles** with over **120m GP**, and we have room for one new teammate. **Who we are:** - Awesome group of team-oriented players who are eager to help each other.   - Great mix of F2P and P2P players, so anyone is welcome.   - Guild average is **about 2.5m GP**.   - Guild refresh is at 7:30pm PST. **What we do:** **1. Sith Raid:** - Completed T6 and working on Heroic. **2. Tank &amp; Rancor Raids:** - Heroic Tank &amp; Rancor Raids alternating ever day depending on GBC.   - Raids are open for 24 hours so everyone gets on the board.   - FFA Zerg at guild reset (7:30pm PST). **Who we’re looking for:** - Positive, team-oriented players!   - Active daily players who are earning **600 GBC** every day.   - Committed to full participation in **TB, TW, and Sith Raid** and farming appropriate heroes.   - Discord chat for raid communication.   - Updated [swgoh.gg](http://swgoh.gg) profile.   **If you’d like to join our Heroic team**, please: - Leave a message on our **[Discord channel](https://discord.gg/6U5T3gY)** with a **link to your swgoh.gg profile**
he's the biggest guy on the court, getting that ez shit
Coke and constant hards one isn’t a thing. Even one hard on is questionable. 
Also the criteria changes as soon as you leave the tutorial, it starts mainly based on str and chr but it can factor in int and wiz further down the line
That looks so nice! What's the id of the one on the right?
That goal took three touches from both teams combined: goalie’s kick-out, defender’s header and...well, Zlatan. 
So many? Where?  What?
I don't think it's disappointing, it just means more work at sorting facility (well, assuming that they actually sort it and not just put all trash into a burner anyway). I am pretty happy with disposal service my city provides me with, it is really cheap (it's just a "symbolic" payment when you recycle, AFAIK you have to pay a lot more when you don't which is good IMO) and reliable. What really is disappointing that people in rural areas and small towns usually have no way to recycle their trash and/or are less aware about importance of it and thus don't do it at all.  Rant: I've been recycling for nearly half of my life and I feel bad about throwing an empty water bottle in a normal street trash can or not properly disposing of a small, dead battery yet there are people who not only do not recycle but also leave their trash (and I don't mean a candy bar wrapper or sth, *bags* filled with trash), old appliances or furniture in local forests and empty properties. I mean what the fuck, you are cheating government by not paying for trash disposal and are also commiting a crime and polluting your local forest but you do not bother to use one of many big fucking public dumpsters? You already have to load up your shit onto a car and drive it somewhere, why don't you dispose of it in a proper way? Sorry for the rant mate, I had to vent.
They used remote control construction equipment to clear off the top of Chernobyl until the radiation fried the electronics. They had to resort to choppering in humans with shovels that could only stay 45 seconds. Like 2-3 shovel fulls. 
Greek mythology is super rapey.
Mr. Bezos you surely have more important things to do than post here.
I believe that IOTA is truly undervalued because the media hasn't really paid attention to it and hasn't seen the true, innovative real-world application. I truly think that with some good articles it could seriously impact the price
They have on the Acronym site, just not globally at other stores or nike. 
#**WAH**
Apparently he renounced it before he died and said it was a cult but his daughters have invested over 100 million and sit on the board of director. I scrolled through one of the daughters Instagram pages and she’s definitely drunk the Kool Aid, she was praising her training and the group for helping her reach her full potential. She also had a bunch of pictures with the leader and posted a bunch from Mexico (I assume the sisters bankrolled the compound there) 
Ha! I figured you might be taking that angle. 👍
If your hands get sweaty get a quiet fan. Take feel breaths in between fights in the late game and take a minute to calm down. 
The government backed the walkout?  Wait until the NRA finds out that the Trump administration and the Republican Congress are behind this! 
Those are indeed size 5, the option to run 4x S5 weapons is back.
I hate you for this, why couldn't you leave that place dead like everyone else!
I thought this was made of glass at first. Awesome work!
Sounds like a lot of fun. Did it guys rent motor bikes or buy them and if so how much? 
Sure thing Fam
Sorry I wasn’t paying close enough attention to what I had been sent, it’s the forensics files. My bad.
Joke  You
Now that you know the process and difficulties, would you do again?  Any tips for someone who would like to do the same? I really want to do this.  
😊
They do not search for socio economic diversity whatsoever. There are endless articles on this subject - elite universities tend to have an average family income of something around 250k, which is by definition the top 1%. There is zero evidence whatsoever they advantage "poor" students, I don't even think there's an option to explain that on the application.
they're white people, though.  
Guava juice 
I know nothing about Iron Fist. But before it I watched the other Marvel shows.  By itself... it would have been a meh show. But when I felt compelled to watch it in case anything would come up in Defenders it was bad.  Take a try at it, but if you don't like it, well, all you need to know is Danny Rand is the Immortal Iron Fist, Protector of K'un Lun, and the sworn enemy of the Hand. Don't worry if you forget, he'll remind you.
***2 years worth of Saint Quartz made a glopping noise as it flows endlessly into Jeanne Horta***
tickle that mofo.
Replying just so I can know if we ever get clarification. 
Ik denk dat het eerste waar we het over moeten hebben is hoe je tegen dat tentamen aankijkt. Voor mij was dit het accountancy tentamen, wat ik in mijn zesde jaar (lees: dit jaar) *eindelijk* heb afgesloten na een jaar klunzen. Wat ik daarmee bedoel is dat de stress je nekt. Als jij als persoon er alles aan hebt gedaan, dan kan het alleen maar goed gaan. Mocht blijken dat dat echt niet lukt, ga dan bij jezelf na: Hoe komt dit? Bij vrijwel elke hogeschool heb je recht op een **gouden kans**. Dit is een derde kans, *tailored to your needs* om het tentamen toch te halen. Het belangrijkste hierin is dat je communicatief bent: Ken je de stof wel en nekt het tentamen je qua stress, vind je het framework van het tentamen moeilijk of snap je het gewoon echt niet?   Communiceer hierover met je decaan. Geef aan dat je echt je best doet. Hoe ver ben je erin? Bij mij hebben ze het vormgegeven door een mondeling en dat betekende dat ik een 8 haalde in plaats van een 3. Er zijn altijd mogelijkheden, maar blijf positief. Wees communicatief, inventariseer voor jezelf waar het probleem ligt en bespreek dat. Wat denk je dat de issue is?  Boven alles is het altijd een optie om te praten met mensen uit het vakgebied. Ik heb een accountant benaderd die mij heeft geholpen om de stof in de praktijk te gieten, wat het heel makkelijk maakte. Daar ben ik de beste Redditor tot op de dag van vandaag dankbaar voor.
/u/alpha1998 is getting downvoted, but the scenario he describes is technically possible if the run back to ground is verrrrry long and your line is very small (heneious voltage drop losses pretty much). Essentially you have build a voltage divider where the load is one leg of the divider and line losses the other. Quick back of the envelope math looks to me like if you have a 16AWG circuit run 3000 foot on a 500W load you'd develop a touch potential of about 35 volts. If you have wet hands and the weirdest install ever it's almost slightly feasible. 
53, here. Feel the same way. Dabbled w step parenthood, which was a disaster.  No regrets 
What did you find helped you deal?
AF Hemingway series is good but over priced in my mind. Especially for the short story. 
It amazes me how many people do not appreciate [KISS](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/KISS_principle).
Just input Spanish words into the search bar of this sub. It won’t disappoint.   Edit: not this sub but the real sub. 
why bother, lets just see whom getting second place... though you might have alot of territory now, but non when the battle/Round ends  (ﾉ◕ヮ◕)ﾉ*:･ﾟ✧
I typically like these types of shows but I guess its just so far out of my experience and midwestern culture that its just makes me cringe more then anything.
No. I did some research and found this one 
I love getting grav'd as rein, an ulting genji was such an easy pin before the change. and whenever a nanoblade dashes behind my shield, instant 180 shatter then another 180 and shield up while my team deals with him safely ;)
not a cubs fan?
Me @ UVA. RIP in peace, my mental health and quality of life for the next three years. Maybe I'll see you again someday, C'ville.
Hopefully this doesn’t get buried but it is probably stupid! I’m fairly new-ish but I promise I’ve been reading and researching!  I’m planning to get the Hyatt credit card for a cat 5 hotel for an upcoming (Jan) trip to Hawaii to stay at the regency Maui. Through my research I’m seeing that it seems they book off a certain number of reward rooms? As of this second, the nights are there to be booked with points but I don’t have the card yet. My question is basically **is it a roll of the dice that by the time I get the card and meet the minimum spend all 4 nights will still be available, or is there something I can do in the interim?** (2 nights from me, 2 nights from my travel companion). Less importantly, to redeem sequentially 2-2 for my points and my travel partners points, I just call to stay in the same room, right? Thanks all!!! 
Yeah it's pretty good, sadly his steals drop every month.
He's Swedish, but Skåne used to be Danish and many cross the border for work, because it's right next to Copenhagen.  People from Skåne don't "automatically" know Danish, but the dialect is much closer so it takes little effort for us to understand each other. For the same reason quite a lot of people are fluent in both languages, but Swedes/Danes can talk Swedish/Danish to each other and communicate quite easily.
Ofc, he’s the ultimate easter bun. 
Dilawan ang toga! 🙄
For sneakers, a lot of New Balance come in wide versions.  I believe Red Wing does wide boots.  A lot of dress shoe makers have wide versions, like Allen Edmonds, Alden, and Carmina.
Why not just get the full its like 25 at walmart?
Blame small population hence small crowds I think
https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/democrats-wont-give-trump-credit-for-tpp-withdrawal I stand corrected. Ty
It's almost like there's some community dedicated to posting these articles here and upvoting the hell out of them right away so they make it to the front page and get the momentum to stay there.
Well that is the difference. You cannot reanimate Monika at all since she leaves you no file to reanimate. With others however there are files to reanimate them.  As for the game being dead, even Sayori realized it's the terrible place and it's just better to end it. Both in "good ending" and "quick ending".
500 is a lot of money to put down at once.  Don't be ridiculous man
Yup, the Garden's gonna be straight TERRYFYING tonight. 
But she found this offensive, did you say sorry? Or did you tell her that she isnt allowed to feel that because youve dated women? 
Lil Dirk!!! 
Does a bloodbath count?
No problem! It's at the corner of Lorain and W117th. Also I recommend the Clevelamd Cuban sandwich!
But what game is he playing?   Is he focused on a single chess game or tie longer, larger game of the 2018 championship and staying world champion.
Oh shut up 
My safe word will be ***wh***iskey
The guy is an idiot, but jesus this is a huge over reaction. We dont have to publicly shame him and delete his stuff, just stop being a fan of him.
For most games, you can go to the System Management, go to Manage Game Data, go to Additional Data, and uninstall the updates. 
I live for these threads. 
JOHN CENA!  Class Assassin: "You can't see me!"
Looking absolutely Chick Fil A'd
nice!
I don't think 30yo watch these stations for news anymore. In 10 to 20, people not watching these stations will be the najority of voters.  We'll still have the issues with facebook or whatever comes next but at least people will then be exposed to the idea that they can be manipulated.
Everything beautiful in the world is dying
Already done, oddly enough I have some customer gcode in my slic3r that moves to x100 and then moves slowly all the way up to the top of the z as you stated. 
finally dude . everybody is so toxic
Yummy 🤤
Who said it was a basic function?  Even if it is, they gotta pull you in some how. As much as I hate it, some things can't be free.
SCARRENCE TERRENCE IS HERE
Will never say no to help ;)
Done. I’m interested in what the results would be; keep us posted!
 &gt; You can't? Read about the objectives of the 1948, 67 and 73 wars.  1948 - really, that was mainly in response to the massive refugee outflow of Palestinians into neighboring states.  Both sides were going at it in a civil war, but proto-Israelis were winning and the Palestinians were being driven from their homes.  1967 - not even close.  Begin and Rabin admitted that Egypt posed no realistic threat, and [Moshe Dayan admitted](https://www.nytimes.com/1997/05/11/world/general-s-words-shed-a-new-light-on-the-golan.html) that most of the conflict with Syria was the result of Israeli aggression in the DMZ.  After an Egyptian military buildup (that the CIA saw as defensive, and Begin and Rabin saw as ineffective, and that the Russians may have caused by saying that Israel was preparing to grab Golan) Israel grabbed the W.Bank, Golan Heights (Syria) and Sinai (Egypt).  Basically, a pseudo-defensive war of territorial acquisition.  1973 - Egypt/Syria tried to grab back the land (Sinai, Golan) that Israel took in 1967.  Egypt and Syria invaded their own land.
Damn. I’ve been there. Its so hard to NOT spend. You feel so gratified that you pay off your card only to put more debt onto it...   You can do it though!! Make a pact to pay this one off and hold off the spending
Because there's only one kind of doctor in the eyes of most people. A rich one. And the rich do not garner sympathy.
Ok 
1-2-3 inning
installed on unraid docker, getting the same error. Following
Yep. She turns 80 this year, so does my dad their birthdays are 7 days apart
It’s by CydiaGeek
they are all soros employees and soros is a former nazi so....
Je crois qu'il parle du point faible de toutes les démocraties, qu'elles permettent la mise au pouvoir de régimes autoritaires et dangereux si leur bon fonctionnement n'est pas assuré... Je crois... 
『ＥＬＩＷＯＯＤ  ＤＩＤ  ＹＯＵ  ＬＡＹ  ＴＨＩＳ  ＥＧＧ』
Thanks bro/bra.
When I was a kid, these shorts had a bit of a "Mandela Effect" on me. I was convinced Roger was really an old cartoon from the 40s.
Is he actually white or black? I’ve heard all types of shit, and then seen tweets where he says “trans black,” but haven’t found anything about it. Someone show me some links so I can laugh at this guy even harder. 
Is that what I said? Or are you demonstrating more of your inability to understand other people?
Send nudes 
What's the place?
[I'm with Herr.](http://rs126.pbsrc.com/albums/p91/mrjosker/hitlery.jpg~c200)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/HillaryForPrison) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What???? Lol final four have some pride seed means nothing. And your not beat yet Jesus 
Gosh darn it Mr. Towers!
yeah it was april fools last year
they are a woman that i can respect 
Just to let you people know, if you get Sommersby in Countries like the UK you are not getting the same shit as here in Denmark.  It is actually a much much much better product than the carbonated watered down apple wine with sugar we have here in DK.  It is surprisingly comparable with brands like Strongbow, Magners and Bulmers! as a cider snob I can't understand why we can't have nice ciders easily available in Denmark either.
play defense pls
Thank you Mxy, I'm glad you enjoy my voice.
No
Well, MLS is also the worst league Zlatan is playing/played for in his career, and he kind of conquered everywhere he went to before. Dude's a physical specimen, 6'5 and extremely fast and agile for his size, who has no weakness when it comes to scoring goals. He can do it all, from anywhere, literally. I know he's old now, but MLS still has no defender or goalkeeper that can even bother him. All his teammates need to do, is find him, like they did today. That's all
TITO
I'm from Spain, but I only met Indians that came to my university for a fellowship and Indians that are on American TV shows. So that's why I had that perception.
b**** I'm not joking
Honestly really good bot.
Im not talking about at range, im talking about 5-10 feet away. My aim has nothing to do with it. Like i said, what worked last week no longer works. 
Its 2018 ffs who still smokes
I'm sorry, you must have mistaken, I don't have any Moon Sandshrew to giveaway
I was like 7. it had snowed outside so I went sledding. My deck has this barrier around the bottom (I don't know, I can't really explain in) and I was sledding right down into it. I thought I'd have enough time to stop but I didn't and I slammed into it and my ear got kinda whacked by it. Maybe that's why 10 years later, I have horrible hearing! But anyway, no one sleds down that area anymore. We sled off to the side
I remember one of the guys mentioning 2015, so I’m assuming that’s when it was installed. 
You need to let this one go
It's good that you recognize that this is an issue. That's always the first step to correcting the problem.  Why do you think you do this? Is your boyfriend not exciting enough? Do you love then attention? Is your life fairly boring and you use this to compensate?
I never once saw Lindsay Lohan in that girl on the cover. She doesn't look like she's done her weight in meth, for starters.
And I believe Yakko was Ringo Star. 
asi empezo thedonald y salio electo...
tomorrow
Simply gorgeous darlin
Sounds like the shit open air markets I saw during OEF.   At least some of them had these yummy little gummy things we could buy. Can’t find them over here. 
Which specific comic series contains the story arc that follows Vader between RotS and ANH? I would love to read it. I just want to be sure to start with the correct run.
Recessive genes my dude
Oh dang he is cute. 
&gt; This is an alt.  Why?
T RO
No bro clearly you're the one with the problem you libcuck!  /s 
Fuck Ohio State. 
Hey there my friend,  Unfortunately you linked to temporary video files which usually get deleted after 30 minutes. To create a permanent clip, you need to click "create" after you have fetched the video clip. The one you linked is not meant to last forever, that's why it says *tmp-clips* in the URL.
The robot is a time travelling capsule corp robot that got sent too far in the past and ended up jammed in some ruins.
I’m stupid, what are traps? I see that word everywhere.
This.  Every time I see someone say something about "changing the brain, not the body" my first thought is "This exact thought process is why lobotomies were a thing,"
Thank you sooo much for your reply!! I was going to get the calfskin so it wouldn't be so delicate.. Is the one from Min you have lambskin still or calfskin? I'm so between this and the LV Palm Springs PM, I think I need both! lol Emily's CC clasp was sturdy?
I found Bill Burr
What's ambiguous? Because there might come a time in which a fighting force of competent and well armed volunteers may be necessary for the security of the United States, the right of every citizen to keep effective weapons and ammo in private possession shall not be infringed. 
The legacy races are just that, legacy. They're not core races, they're in an appendix in the back.  As core races the Lashunta replace Elves (alien, beautiful, mystical) , the Ysoki replace Gnomes and Halflings (small, communal, basically insane), and the Vesk replace Half-Orcs (large, strong, distrusted).  You've still not explained how Ysoki have replaced Catfolk.
Wtf
why is this not a real game?
DDP vs The Machine  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mshCWl3Jkyk
I tried this. I forgot that there was an actual body in the back, which is why I was speeding. 
Answer to the Fermi Paradox right here, there's an abundance of ETI but they can't be arsed invading the Galaxy and upload to a VR Utopia instead.
Alright, thanks for the tip :) 
I only have about shoulder length hair, it's just fine and super tangle prone on the underside. 
What are the options?😏
bruh how can you say you'd rather have a damn back up centre and jj fucking reddick on your team over one of the top 3 players to ever play the game smh...
In comparison, most of the video games offered advantages to those own the dlc/expansion pack. For example, World of Warcraft, you can play the game with out expansion pack. The consequence is obvious. You can't even reach the level cap for the end game content. Those new classes and content are all locked until you buy the expansion pack.   Eso and Wow are same. Just do not let ESO clouded your mind. If you want the best experience, you have to buy their content with extra cost, rent or buy one way or another. Jewelry crafting is the same thing as SPC set and VMA weapon. You either own the content or live with it. Eso actually is a fair deal, at least you can reach the fairly competitive state. In wow, swtor and ffxiv, there is no way you can do it at all.
I have a goal to try as many different foods with peanut butter as I can, if I remember to.
Not with that shadow on the ground giving up your position.
Any applicable races would be listed above the head with color graded text
wow rude
I have no idea. But I’ll tell you that some English majors go to law school if you’re into that.  I think you could find a job, but the probability of it being related to English is low.
 The wheel weaves as it wills. 
Casual.
SemiAmusingBot says: I am now installed on a VPS. reply #3 test
17-2 run, disgusting
Additionally, she praised Dream Daddy, which was a dating sim, but without the female characters to romance. Ultimately excluding female characters from a video game.
ITT it's because every time you talk about the pods you run the risk of everyday life becoming an ad.
Proper introduction 
added
Since you didin't post your major its hard to make a solid judgement, but in terms of the enviroment/location/social life it would hands down be Tennessee.
As much as I wish I had the Skeleton, I hope they don't bring it back for the sake of the people that have them. There's only a couple skins in the game that every time you see them, you know they're at least decent.
Satan
Vulpix, that you?
The score for the opening of season 6 finale was amazing!
“I met his girlfriend, they’re both good guys”
But what are the living costs and what are the jobs in the surrounding area like .   Being paid £100 a hour is great if the cost of living is low but if you're in a big city that money will go much shorter 
Don't jinx it for me.
Nah everyone has at least one bag full of shopping bags
Balkie truly shows his depth as an actor in that film.
This Wagner kid is in incredible shape. He's worn Loyola out all game.
All in the Family was a failure foe Lear.  It did exactly the opposite of what he wanted because the conservative yutz became a beloved TV icon while the heroes are hated to this day.  He is still writing scripts and even has an organization to write propaganda into shows.
What's the context? Hanson was a spy, right?
See that blue water? Dunk it in the blue water. There's blue water everywhere now.
Solved! That's the one. Thank you so much!
Thanks, I have a psychiatrist and a therapist so don't worry I'm trying to fix this. I appreciate your concern though, happy redditing.
How i met your mother..... I have watched it 7 times 
I could see it slowly gaining a few % a month while still buying more on dips and selling when it's gained 50-75%.  Then buy back 30-40% more than you had. Rinse and repeat. I've gone from holding 250.000 at 1 cent to holding 2.4m at 4 cents. Now I traded to btc to nano on binance and will trade back when it's stable again.  I've missed 3 surges but then just wait for the next dip. There will always be a next dip. Whether the next one will be 6 cents to 3 cents or 20 cents to 10 cents... No clue.
Link!
Does it come with gas 
So fuckin' Scary. 
You seem to be confusing speech about something with the actual act. Don't do that.
(Note: Bitcoin Cash users not affected.)
Hopefully it will happen. The screenplay is ready.
Yeah, it's the singles of dororo. I'm not quite through it yet (1 volume left), but it's been great so far! It's a lot more shonen-y than the other, more mature tezuka stuff I have.
And yes I’ve tried, against 10 training dummies lined up, it does significantly less damage than the shredder. Idk if that changes against the DoG, and if so I’ll give it a try. But dps wise I’m skeptical
Accepting that you won't get into t20 type schools is often the hardest part, and it seems like you're doing well. 
This game has had so many minor swings so far.
[Archive.is link](https://archive.is/2020/http://theduran.com/skripal-case-becomes-even-weirder/)  ^(Archive bot here:  Click link to create and view archive.)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/WayOfTheBern) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What low level scum you have to be to intentionaly  seek to  destroy a persons career just for lols. Unmod this piece of shit.
[Dry water](https://www.wikiwand.com/en/Dry_water) is actually a thing, but very different from how you described it.
I'm a city fan? What does that even mean?
&gt;Do I make sure he understands beyond a shadow of a doubt that I'm over the idea of being a mother?  Honestly, if you find the idea of having children repugnant, it's highly doubtful that sentiment will change.  (And the biological clock thing is bullshit.)   With that in mind, you need to have a serious discussion with him and point-blank tell him that it'll never happen.  Even mention sterilization.  While you may not want the latter, it tends to make SOs show their true colors.  If he's as "open" as he says, he'll support you 100%.  But if he starts waffling, e.g., "Well, that's permanent!" or "What about me?", then you'll know that he's being insincere.  In that case, I'm afraid the only viable consequence is a break-up.  
That almost certainly wasn’t authorized from kremlin, though. 
I'm sharing tons of dumb stuff I've been doing in the game and I am not part of ubisoft in anyway, just a decently paid apprentice electrician from North Carolina and so far I am really enjoying this game. Although that Faith bitch is really getting on my nerves popping up everywhere 🤣😂🤣
Protip: go in your PSN privacy settings and don't allow anyone to see your real name.
Do we all get 20 bucks on this thread or just the first 3 to answer.  I accept paypal.
wentz really?
That sounds like a very sad poem.   The Most Interesting Event of the Year, by NoLifeHere   I won a mug from KitKat  It hasn't arrived yet  This was a couple of weeks ago
My man is about to be 5'5 longways and wide
This post has been removed due to improper flair.  All posts are required to be flaired as [INSPO], [WDYWT], [ART], [DISCUSSION], [REVIEW], [NEWS], or [ADVERT]. Please resubbmit your post with the proper tag in your title.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/streetwear) if you have any questions or concerns.*
True to Caesar.
Good: The live side and the brilliant song 'Grantchester Meadows'  Bad: The Grand Vizier's Garden Party, i just don't like it.
it's live what is there to edit
yes mam!
I have heard this a few times about hops (one other time from you I believe), I don't know that I am using isomerized hops or not, but this is probably my 4th batch and I have had no issues.  I am going to get through this one then try the way that you mentioned going forward.   Regarding the infusing. I am currently doing my 1F in a 5 gallon food grade bucket with cloth over the top. Could I just keep it in that same bucket, throw in the flavors and add a lid to it like you mentioned? Then filter it before putting into the keg?  This is what I was going to try out next, before I decided to post. Sounds a lot like what you just said.  Lastly, when you put it in the keg, do you just hook it up and let it sit for a few days to carbonate? Mine has been in the kegorator for about 4 days, and it is just now starting to get some C02 in the pour.  I have no past keg/brewing experience. Only kombucha, and i was 2F in the bottles.
That is so adorable! Wish my parents loved my pet family ;)
Taker only wins if he’s not done.  There’s no way he’s going out standing up.
I would like to add one caution: Make sure that the cable end shows "open" as well when the other end is not shorted. This makes sure that you are not testing another faulty cable that's shorted.
Sadly. there does not appear to be a T.V. You vaguely recall reading something about technology failing north of that giant Wall you came out near, but you dismissed that because you didn’t understand how a wall would affect that kind of thing. It’s not like it blocks the signals or anything right? Who knows, you’re JUST A NORMAL FARMER, what would you know about the ELDRITCH MAGIC that is how electricity and radio waves and that sort of thing function?   There does appear to be plenty of gossip going on though, too much for you to take in all at once.  /u/Gadzooks3
After seeing clips of that show, I really wish I had been there
It's nicotine that has next to no throat hit.  If you vape 48mg of regular nicotine, it'd be like inhaling sandpaper.  48mg of nicotine salt would feel like nothing.  So, you can have high strength nicotine without harshness. This allows MTL RTAs/RDAs and pod systems to deliver lots of nicotine with little juice.
Awesome
Name?
As a patient care tech that just got off, this is the kind of motivation I needed to hear after today’s shift
It says the restaurants name on it BurgerFi not just burger 😂😂 that’s be funny tho if it branded what burger was on it 
If they have any contact with you, yes, they can do harm. They can also do smear campaigns. So yes, you can be abused. Thats what I was talking about here. 
Do you know what he said to the counselor?  The article was vague. 
I'm now gay for the sexiest man alive.
Ask her an opinion on a piece of clothing? then you can go into what its for e.g. an event maybe, or a concert, then you talk about hobbies from there or something
I agree.
yes I do
Hopefully some home games will revitalize us, but 2 points in 4 games is pretty atrocious.
FUCK YOU
Pmd
A
No unfortunately no briefcase or chronograph, knife or key fob.
Try 3sets of 8 negatives with a minute rest in between. Also see if you can handle every other day but if not do it twice a week. 
I have a bachelors already but the economy is horrid! I have to get a masters to get anywhere and I want to. I cant afford to live on my own especially while getting a masters degree. I do want to have a career but the pressure they keep putting on me is seriously stressing me out. I have so many things I want to do and on my mind and then they add this nonsense in that I don't care for.
Try queuing in NA between 2am and 8am Pacific Time. Even without map selection, it can often take a very long time to get into a game. Add in hard map selection with zero randomization and anyone who wants to play Miramar outside of primetime hours is going to experience extremely long queue times.  If you add too many game modes and options, you're spreading out the playerbase too much and matchmaking absolutely will be an issue. And we're at what is likely the peak of popularity for this game. It will only get worse as player counts inevitably decline over the years.
That's not the point, you are reaching,
Fluffy matzah balls all the way.
Are we going by the way this is written, or by the way someone could have meant it to be? If we are going by the way it’s written, it’s not ambiguous. 
oh no, corporate media is extremely dangerous to our democracy?   Oh phew, the sinclair group wasn't saying that.
Hmmm makes me wonder if your whole life is riddled with negative feedback but you don’t even realize it cause youre “addicted to it” 
Yeah down here in Texas, we all cary guns with us, everywhere anytime!
Cause you eat the warm meal to fill you, desert is more for the sweet taste to top off the full belly right before a good nap
sac pact doesnt work on Jaraxxus hero anymore
Nope. We have 6 players that see consistent action 
Shia surprise
nah bro they where just looking for help with a flat tire/s
Stealing Chris Chans storys then?
no ty
This seems to be a recurring theme. If Israel wants peace they will need to step away from the whataboutisms. If they want to be truly respected and not perpetually defending themselves. They will need to learn it's about their actions and not the actions of their enemy. It's a big horrible tasting pill. But again, if they want peace it will need to be swallowed.
We forgot about Virginia already?
So you are admitting that Russia supports them? Then according to you their ideas and opinions are invalid. I don’t  read breitbard. Read something other than slate/Salon. My only point was that Russia supporting something doesn’t make it invalid, you had to paint it with your own biases about how you are right and everyone else is wrong. 
This reply seems oddly hostile. The 'proof' is his behavior over the last five years throughout the Doom community (how can I prove my opinion on a person, anyway). Anyone can google his name and read any one of the many threads on the zdoom or zandronum forums or whoever else documenting why people think he is an asshole. I like Brutal Doom a lot, I have no axe to grind, him being a tremendous douche is just pretty apparent if you've spent any time interacting with him. But this is a conversation that has been done to death multiple other times in multiple other places, and I realize he has a lot of fans and defenders for various reasons, so I doubt this conversation will be productive.
Good shit! I appreciate you defending the integrity of the trade. It isn't perfect and it may *never* happen, but for discussion sake it is as close as I can make it. Both teams should be happy with the returns as well as future outlook and financial flexibility. 
Joe Gomez fucking around is so terrible it's funny. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nZwcmMaQUB8
Don’t have a cow
At this point I’ve given up
Mo Wagner about to steal Jean’s great great granddaughter
*slap*
Get a punching bag in your yard/garage.  Helps with this. Also, try to avoid playing games that induce the mega monkey tilt you are experiencing.   Remember, its just a game and its meant to be played for enjoyment.  
No.  You set your resolution in the game settings.  That, as far as the game is concerned, is the size of your monitor.  You may get a pixel here or there depending on which resolution you choose and how square or rectangular it happens to be.  But, those settings are exposed to all players.  The only point where your physical monitor size comes into play is how easy or difficult it is to pick out detail within the game.  If you have a massive monitor you will likely find it easier to see enemies where you are expecting them.  However, your eyes will have a larger area to scan to find things you aren't expecting as well.  Even that is a tradeoff.  I hear this question a lot, hopefully this will put it to bed.
I went in it after a late shift/close one night. Fun but cold. Surprisingly security didn’t care. 
No it would not. How could they not think that the ship wouldn’t be useful for the fight or for fighting monsters? If they took a limo and some kind of giant monster attacked them then they would be stuck without the ship’s weaponry. Yes, they’ve faced worse with the Argo II, but why risk sending away both the ship weaponry and the statue? 
 Mortals receive the divine gift of intellect, the potential for wisdom, but they misuse to destroy the beauty of creation. Mortals do not succumb to evil, they are the evil. They create it, and spread it with minds they shouldn't possess. How can we call ourselves gods if we watch this plight and do nothing to stop it?
Hello! Welcome :) 
Ryan Braun has herpes. 
Sorry your boyfriend has a heart?   
launch him into the sun
Contribution splitting doesn't allow you to make extra concessional contributions in your name.
Yeah I think UFC for women just got more popular and it’s just gonna get harder and harder 
I'm so desperate. 😣
Yep, Toast conceded.
OP if u need extra hand let me know.
**SIR HUMPHREY**:   And will you credit this base drudge's words,   That speaks he knows not what?
Well, if you had actually listened and paid attention, you would have realized that this was an RP server. The guy was sent in to "negotiate" for the guys in the prison, the guys in the prison were tied up and behind bars. The shoorlter even says that they don't negoiate with them. Roleplay in this game is something else, you should all try it.
Guess it wasn't gory enough, huh? Damn were they some hardcore ten year olds.
Wonder if it was a nervous laughter. I've definitely pulled shit like that at bad times bc I giggle when I'm getting in trouble.
You're only 24, and this relationship is only 3 years long. You keep using phrases that make it sound like more than it is. That's probably the same language you're using to justify staying in this relationship.   Don't let people blame their actions on alcohol. That's bullshit. She was drunk, she wasn't a fuckin baby who had no idea what was going on. 
Andere Quellen zur (möglicherweise) gleichen Meldung:  * [Osternacht: Papst Franziskus ruft zu mehr Engagement gegen Ungerechtigkeit auf](https://www.berliner-zeitung.de/politik/osternacht-papst-franziskus-ruft--zu-mehr-engagement-gegen-ungerechtigkeit-auf-29951304) (berliner-zeitung.de) * [Osternacht: Papst Franziskus ruft zu mehr Engagement gegen Ungerechtigkeit auf](https://www.mz-web.de/politik/osternacht-papst-franziskus-ruft--zu-mehr-engagement-gegen-ungerechtigkeit-auf-29951304) (mz-web.de) * [Schlaglichter: Papst in Osternacht: Brecht aus eintöniger Routine aus](http://www.wn.de/Schlaglichter/3239173-Kirche-Papst-in-Osternacht-Brecht-aus-eintoeniger-Routine-aus) (wn.de) * [Papst in Osternacht: Brecht aus eintöniger Routine aus](http://www.general-anzeiger-bonn.de/news/ticker/Papst-in-Osternacht-Brecht-aus-eint%C3%B6niger-Routine-aus-article3819749.html?f=111) (general-anzeiger-bonn.de) * [Papst in Osternacht: Brecht aus eintöniger Routine aus](https://www.augsburger-allgemeine.de/newsticker/Papst-in-Osternacht-Brecht-aus-eintoeniger-Routine-aus-id50773261.html) (augsburger-allgemeine.de)
Extremely doable. Just have 28 rolled 1 gramme blunts, snacks ready, movies, and just never stop smoking. Even piss with that blunt.   How 3 friends and I celebrated my 18th with a QP split into 4 zones. Was a wild sesh. 
I made the mistake of showing my friend the white Bear first, it really turned him off, that epaiode is really dark, I think I should've gone with either chronological order or some light hearted episode and up the ladder from their. Though I did made him watch the show anyway and he liked it. His favorite hated in nation.
&gt; If you take Giannis off the bucks, they’re maybe a 15 win team this season.   Definitely more than 15 wins, considering they have Khris Middleton, Bledsoe, Jabari Parker, and Malcolm Brogdon.
That would involve doing some welding to the under side of my chassis. This is something I can afford right now and this more practical.
accepted you :)
Ghandi
hmm Appreciate your Opinion.
I messaged you with the sign up link :)
the best advice i can give is to go out alone and just approach people. If the people in your life don't give a damn, you don't owe them anything. Go to places and events you're interested in and have genuine fun. Life is suffering homie. plain and simple, we bond over our mutual struggles and interests, what people seek out the most is someone who can make their life bearable and entertain them. The key is if you can make yourself happy you can make others happy, that's how you take control of your life, your circle and your social interactions. Make people rise to your level, don't grovel for their attention or seek it out if they're not seeking you. "the best gift you can give to others is to make the most of yourself" remember that and repeat it. let the fakes and haters stay where they are.   love is not possible without personal growth and self respect, love actually develops naturally if those 2 things are a solid part of your personality and life.  hope this helped.
Alright, who is getting drunk with me?
Everyone just wants to belong and feel special. 
**[Original Submission by /u/ModisDead](/r/goodlongposts/comments/88jwj4/usunagainstgold_responds_to_history_geeks_clear/)** into /r/goodlongposts  ---  # Subreddit Overview * A community for: **3 years** * # of subscribers: **11,888** * # of mods: **2** * Subscribers per mod: **5,944**  # Popular Posts Summary * Top domains: np.reddit.com **(100%)** * % NSFW: **0%** * Average Score: **3**  # Discussion Summary * Average Comment Length: **~42** words per comment * Flesch-Kincaid Reading Level: **7** * Comments per post: **~0**  # A sampling of top posts: * Top all time: [/u/mom0nga responds to: TIL A couple adopted a chimpanzee and which learned to open doors, use keys, get dresses, water the plants, feed the horses, use a computer and drive their car too. But when he was 14 yrs old, he brutally attacked a family friend totally disfiguring her. [+38] (91 points by /u/ModisDead)](/r/goodlongposts/comments/5mqu1n/umom0nga_responds_to_til_a_couple_adopted_a/) * Top this month: [/u/thesmellnextdoor responds to: TIL that in a review of clinical drug trials, almost all negative studies were unpublished, leading to the false impression that 93% of antidepressant trials had positive results. When unpublished studies were included, 51% of all clinical trials were posi... [+37] (47 points by /u/ModisDead)](/r/goodlongposts/comments/82wlvc/uthesmellnextdoor_responds_to_til_that_in_a/) * Top this week: [/u/ValenceLP responds to: Lady at the store tried to ID me for buying liquor this morning. [+43] (25 points by /u/ModisDead)](/r/goodlongposts/comments/87hwky/uvalencelp_responds_to_lady_at_the_store_tried_to/)  ## **[Subscribe at /r/goodlongposts](/r/goodlongposts)**   
Black mirror 
I don't remember ever seeing that option but whatever works I guess
In the short scene he had I really enjoyed Ser Arthur Dayne
Fuck up more what? 
It was my first one and very fun while it held my interest. I did not play regular mode though i just played arena cause it was more fun to me. But yea i remember tanking and being stuned for Damn near a min while my team died around me and there was Fuck all i could do.  
Wait, people give blow jobs as gifts on their birthday? Clearly I need to start going to more birthday parties. 
Yuck! 9gag.
It might be the TV.  I have had a 4k monitor and now a 1440p monitor with a Samsung VA panel, and my Sony X900e looks better than either of them. I sit 6.5ft from it, where as I sit 2ft from the monitors, so pixel density isn't much different at that distance. It's just that the TV uses better processing, panels (brighter with better contrast...though my current monitor gets to 1:5400,) and true HDR.  However, my TV can't do 120hz at higher than 1080p...and using a mouse would be weird. So I keep my PC with the monitors.
If a 75c/hr (which any idiot could see was coming) increase in minimum wage means you have to lay people off, you clearly aren't very good at planning very far into the future.
No, and in fact, if you quit too many matches, they issue a temporary penalty for quitting where you get reduced XP from future matches.
thank you. 
Space station 
Some of those comments are pretty bad, calling for a "militia response" to the "invasion."  These people are delusional and dangerous.  &gt;If they are not sent we are organizing a militia response. Follow me on www.gab.ai as @TexasVet for updates.
Invisibowl
I remember seeing the first spongebob movie as a teenager and remember all the young children running up and down the aisles. There was a scene where spongebob and Patrick dry up and seemingly “die” and I remember dozens of children scream-crying that “Spongebob is DEAD!!! Wahhhhhhhhh!”
I'm really digging the stormtrooper that comes with the dewback
Maybe you can post something?
&gt; once they fix the streaming system  ???
I have to trade: 11,15,16,28,40,44,55,59,62,68,70,75,79,83,91,93,102,108,117,118,122,131,141,142,146,148,153,155,156,167,190,195,203,206,207,214,216,217,239,242,264,266,268,278,283,288,293,296298,299,302,308,310,311,314,315,322,333,338,344,346,368,371,374,379,399,400,405,409,410,413,419,420,421,423,425,438,444,446,451,453,462,465,477,481,483,488,503,504,513,520,528,530,540,542,564,590,627,633,656,663,664,667  I need: 00,1,3,5,6,8,10,13,19,20,32,37,41,42,45,46,48,50,51,52,58,60,61,64,65,66,69,72,80,87,89,90,92,94,95,96,99,100,103,107,109,112,113,116,121,124,134,138,139,143,144,151,152,154,158,160,161,163,166,168,170,175,177,181,182,183,185,191,192,196,199,200,201,202,205,208,209,211,212,213,215,220,221,225,227,228,229,230,231,233,234,236,240,243,244,247,248,249,250,252,254,259,267,269,273,274,276,277,279,280,282,294,297,300,304,305,309,312,313,316,317,323,325,327,329,330,331,332,335,336,337,342,345,347,355,356,358,359,364,365,367,369,370,372,380,381,382,383,384,387,391,393,395,397,398,401,402,403,412,417,422,424,426,427,430,432,433,434,435,441,447,448,452,455,457,459,464,466,468,470,473,474,475,479,480,482,489,492,493,498,500,501,502,512,515,516,519,521,523,526,532,533,534,535,536,538,544,546,549,550,552,555,558,559,560,562,563,567,568,569,571,572,573,575,583,585,586,588,589,591,592,593,595,596,597,598,600,602,606,610,611,612,614,615,618,620,621,623,628,630,632,634,636,638,640,642,644,646,648,650,651,653,660,665,666,669,670,672,674,675,676,677,678,679,681  Interested?
Egypt
Oh. I meant as foreplay. 
I was thinking of posting this, but afraid everyone would think I was just shitposting. I did this all the time as a kid.
I’m curious too. Our 8 month old puppy looks just like it!
Haha no problem. Also worth considering are [[Fearsome Awakening]] [[Teneb, The Harvester]] and  [[Bladewing, The Risen]]
Last week, happy to get a draw. This week, frustrated it was only a draw... 
You’re doing the hook thing too much
Ted Cruz, is your skinsuit riding up?
I think marner is a lot better than pastrnak.  Pasta plays two minutes more per game, a full extra minute on the pp, and he plays with much better linemates than Mitch.  He’s also a full year older and only has 10 more points than marner.  Marners also way better defensively, he’s one of the best in the entire league at takeaways, and doesn’t give it away very much.  
Thanks! What about for optional quests?
"Marchand is a hero. Every day."  - Don Cherry 2018
like i'm saying, you've never been drunk then lol
On the other hand, I do love a good strawberry cake. 
I remember the Citrix sales engineer mentioning this now that you say this.  He said the current LTSR is good until like 2023, I believe.  That's probably the route that we're going to go.  Most of the time we just want the environment to work, the extra bells and whistles sometimes with the current releases isn't really necessary for us.  Thanks for the point and I'll keep that in mind!
Either Hypergenesis or Ruby Storm, whichever deck gets the last few cards in first from the mail xD. If neither, then Belcher.
Deleted my previous comment because I might have been besides the point.  Here is the code part:  class Node containing the letter  With Node.AddLink(Node _parent, Color)  Do a bunch of add nodes to make the map.  Put each path as a list of nodes, output the sum of the letters and check for words.   Hope this helps!
A potato. Hehe
Stumbled across this late, so idk if you will see it. But as a fellow therapist, I'm curious what you are doing now for work? You seem to be enjoying it more. Always makes life better.
I've never worked with Cubic SDR, but the scanner plugin for sdr# basically does this because the scan speed is so fast. The link is in Russian, but it is easily added to the program.
l’institute du mentally ill 
I wonder if go for gold is a mission chain that rewards doubloons?  World of Warplanes recently had a mission chain that gave a total of 1500 gold.
...Kill the wise one?
Thank you!!
My sibling just posted, “Did they catch the idiot who shouted in conference?”   I replied, “Nope, I booked it as fast as I could and wasn’t caught.”
"no gank no camps". Your words not mine. If that is what you describe what is happening then I do not know what other possibility is happening other than you playing afk farmville. There is generally a reason why people do shit like that, again, it is not some common phenomena that your laners take an entire jungle side from you.   Lets go back to "no ganks no camps", if you are not ganking, or are ganking the wrong places at inopportune times, or you're not counter ganking, your laners (talking about bottom lane) will die/lose lane/lose pressure/lose vision. What will eventually happen is that it is too unsafe for them to venture too far out to even farm minions in their own lane, and their only alternative is to farm your jungle.  The other possibility is that one of your laners is extremely far ahead, and is looking to snowball the game, so you're going to let them take what camps they want and continue to try to snowball with their advantage.  Another possibility is that depending on where you are on the map, it is not logical for you to path over to a particular camp on the other side of the map depending on what objectives are up, so your laners will take those camps from you because you won't be or shouldn't be taking them any time soon.  The final possibility is that they're trolling, hence, report and hope Rito does something. Taking 2 of your camps is the equivalent of taking a whole side of your jungle when a Buff hasn't spawned yet. But this is not supposed to be some common phenomena. 
It's 1 AM now but the article was written 6 hours ago.
To think that our civilization could be toppled by a few oil companies that really don’t have much control over anything is absurd. Ask a stupid question, receive a less than adequate answer. 
With something like 12% of the state’s population having a LTCF.   Can’t wait for Tom to go. 
#PowerBar 🛠  Adds a battery bar above status bar.   |  | --|--- **Version** |1.2 **Developer** | Skyler Kansala **Repository** | http://skylerk99.github.io/ **Size** | 32.85 KB **Dependencies** | `mobilesubstrate`, `org.thebigboss.libcolorpicker` [Download Deb](http://skylerk99.github.io/.//pkgfiles/com.skylerk99.powerbar_1.2_iphoneos-arm.deb)  *To get this package, [Add this repository](https://cydia.saurik.com/api/share#?source=http://skylerk99.github.io/)*   &gt;Hello, Saurik   [Report a bug](https://www.reddit.com//message/compose?to=arx8x&amp;subject=rJailbreakBot+Bug+Report) **|** [Request features](https://www.reddit.com//message/compose?to=arx8x&amp;subject=rJailbreakBot+Feature+Request) **|** [Add a repository](https://www.reddit.com//message/compose?to=arx8x&amp;subject=rJailbreakBot+Add+Repo)
Well then in that case, tough shit OP.
Make some friends. Do them fractals with them. ????? No more "Elitists" who don't want subpar people in their group.
*Pushing a hand through his hair, Jonathan considers the question for a brief moment. His customary smile dances lazily on his lips and his eyes linger upon a certain someone for the briefest of moments. Then, the notepad he is holding snaps closed and he faces Kotone.*  "Pahaha, it would appear a great many people are interested. Very well then. But it would appear that my original scheme of allowing the blackened to commit their own mistake... is now forfeit."  "Ah, I hope each person may lend me their ear. I do not wish to repeat myself."  *A second or two of pause later, Jonathan commences his report.*  "Firstly, with regards to the state of the deceased subject, the process of rigor mortis was complete. A conservative guess for the **time of death** would be **prior to 3 or 4 hours upon discovery of the body**. Since Tooru was last seen at the party, the logical postulate which can be established is that he was murdered sometime between **5pm and 5am**."  "Secondly, the **cause of death is blood loss**. When a certain amount of blood is lost, the body will enter a state of shock. This effectively hinders all systems within the human body and prevents them from functioning - leading to death."  "Thirdly, the various cuts on the subject's body appear to be **unaimed and uncoordinated.** This would imply that, if a human were present, they were struck in a **hurry or panic**. However, this can also be interpreted several other ways, such as **dim lighting** or the use of a **trap**. I personally believe that the latter are less probable due to several reasons I'll elaborate upon later."  "Fourthly, the **bandage** which had been wrapped around the subject's arm **covers a wound**. It does not appear to match the cuts over the subjects body. Unfortunately, I'm not a medical doctor so I cannot give details on possible weapons which can cause such wounds, but it's safe to say that the **wound under the bandage was inflicted using a different method compared to the gashes on the body.**"  "Finally, and I'm sure you've all noticed as well, but all the blood had completely dried. This is mere conjecture as many variables affect how fast it takes for blood to dry, but it should have taken **roughly overnight for something like that to occur.**"  *And with that, Jonathan gives everyone at a pedestal a professional smile.*  "And that is the extent of my autopsy. I hope it will contribute to our discussion."
aye, just the SG-CQB
Pranked
b**** I'm not joking
Yea he only Iced it 5 times that period.
I read your previous story on the Nigerian Hitman, care to share these other stories you mentioned?  Also, what is DVD MLM?
It's a mix of things. The first reason is people are a lot more competitive and also have a high opinion of themselves. The second is people are actually able to recognise the mistakes people are making rather than just saying rubbish. The third is people are experienced enough to realise that the ban system doesn't do a very good job against intentionally feeding players and people will run it down mid without hesitation. I'd estimate 1/10 games in high plat will result in a player running it down mid (on EUW). Finally people are much better are closing out in this elo so comebacks are much more rare. Most of my games in high plat average 25mins.
Not a story Bungie would tell you 
Most Valuable Primate
I was in school as a STEM major with a libertarian-liberal (i know) who was also a vegan and did crossfit. He wasnt *that* bad in class, and at the end of the day he was a good person, but that facebook feed...
Sorry! And thanks. (The first guy was really really quick.)
Could care less
I'm trying to trace some Native ancestry, too. According to my report, I have some on both sides of my family. My mom had never heard any mention of it growing but based on third cousins from her father's (who died when she was young) side having a similar % of NA DNA as me, I at least know it's from one of the grandmothers above a certain generation, but below the one that immigrated from Germany.   In my dad's case, he mentioned his mother had mentioned a NA ancestor and also mentioned being part Cree. His family is Canadian and I don't think they have the same "Cherokee princess" lore that Americans do.   I found a Canadian DNA cousin on that line with NA DNA, too, and wrote to him and, while he hadn't yet been able to authenticate a Native ancestor, he had also heard mention of Cree over the years, which I found to be an interesting coincidence, so it gives me some possible direction to look in. :) 
I put A-Vulpix, Female, Lv1, asked for 21-30 (let me know if it's 20, the ranges don't work like that).  Edit: you can keep Vulpix if you like, was doing a giveaway of them lol
One could only hope! Thanks, it was pretty awesome!
Ironically the negative review seems to have gotten you some exposure.  
Assassins creed 4 imo has the best, most exiting soundtrack to any game. (My opinion). You’re right, when I think about other soundtracks kcd just isn’t enough
Thank god
If Murray struggles in the first few playoff games, will DeSmith get a chance?
Tapered off per my doc's instructions.
Laughing my ass off!!!
Marchand for MVP Don... ffs man.
How does one take a screenshot with that bad quality? (not saying it isn't, like legit question, I thought SS just captured the regular screen's resolution)
Cartucho de escopeta con perdigones de goma, igual a muuuuuy corta distancia *puede* llegar a matar.
When my girlfriend puts her hair up in a ponytail. I don’t know why but she does it so gracefully hot.
I hate ninja give me karma
[@UnSubtleDesi's latest tweet](https://i.imgur.com/ybiTb4q.jpg)  [@UnSubtleDesi on Twitter](https://twitter.com/UnSubtleDesi)  -  ^I ^am ^a ^bot ^| ^[feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=twinkiac)
First: minimalism is as much about action as ownership. I started practicing minimalism in my daily carry items, slowly boiling it down to just a phone and my glasses. The other part of this is not picking anything up on the way; choosing smaller portions of food so you don't have leftovers, for example. My goal is only take my phone and clothes through any doorway, ideally by surrendering or recording anything I "picked up." You can't lose what you don't have.  Second: at home you can make finding things easier by minimizing visual clutter and containers. My closet is for storing seasonal items, with my clothes hanging from a rack in front of it so I don't have to look inside the closet for the jeans I was wearing yesterday. Any shelf space is exactly big enough for what it holds, no more, or else it will collect small items like my phone. By minimizing the places you can put your phone to begin with, and then the effort to check those places, it becomes much harder to lose anything. A lost item goes somewhere, just reduce the number of places it can go.  I'm super prone to losing things. I've heard every suggestion from routine, to "put it where you found it," to mnemonic devices. While the above suggestions haven't kept me from leaving my phone in the fridge or on the table, they have kept me from losing all the other things I'd been dependant on before. Plus, when you only have one thing on your person at any time it becomes much more apparent when it's missing.
Dilly dilly
I don't get it 
It's kind of fuzzy and not exact accounting, but I try and figure out how much joy and future joy I'd get out of it, accounting for direct (pleasure in the moment) and indirect (healthier than my other choice? I'd probably enjoy living longer or being more fit.). I usually buy more expensive groceries because I know that I am treating my body nicer by doing that. I also go to more expensive movie theaters because I enjoy the experience more compared to other theaters enough to justify spending the extra few bucks. It's qualitative, not necessarily always quantitative. Of course, when it can be quantified, it makes the decision much easier, like getting larger toilet paper roles of the same quality I usually get, for the same price per role or something.  As a recent in-between purchase example: I bought 2 patio recliners for $64 that were highly reviewed and looked durable. It was just a great deal, and I was going to buy 2 anyway as long as it was a reasonable price (i.e. not too much more than most of the other high-reviewed recliner sets).
He's simply saying for what it was, it was fantastic outta  the factory. Not crazy fast, but it handled itself very well for it's time. But this person reversed all of that. 
Oh dont you worry, moan as loud as you need! 
Now that they have organized under his rule there is no stopping them! 
Yea think it’s Numel
How is being a 14 yr old and not believing in God going. Also parents chill with it?
omg, "cuddle puddle" just made my day. so frickin cute!! i'm probably gonna steal that term... no apologies!! 😋😋 your babies look so sweet and happy!! adowable
You sound disgusting.
Does this bot follow you everywhere?
https://youtu.be/zk7SQ6ZZxUM Obviously this doesn't solve the underlying problem, but I use this every time my asthma keeps me awake. Doesn't always put me to sleep, but it gives me something to focus on. Sometimes I'll watch a show that I enjoy so that I don't just lie there thinking about how frustrated I am or get upset trying to find a good breathing rhythm. Sometimes just taking your mind off the lack of sleep and the anguish of being short of breath can help! Stay strong and know that you can get through this. 
This submission has been randomly featured in /r/serendipity, a bot-driven subreddit discovery engine. More here: /r/Serendipity/comments/88mszn/usunagainstgold_responds_to_history_geeks_clear/
You look like Gimpys chubby friend from Undergrads 
Is-- is it you?
Post removed u/Mn12ma, as the scene is not hardcore.
Hey there, u/reddituser716! Thanks for submitting to r/dankmemes.  However, reading the title of your submission, *Very important meme for all* literally gave us cancer. We're now off to see an oncologist. In the meantime, resubmit with a title that sucks far less ass and doesn't pose a threat to mankind.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dankmemes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Losers looking up to a guy who pretended to be a douchebag to get famous and then died.  no no, that's literally it
Here ya go, pal. Enjoy!  https://youtu.be/9xf-hXdIgi8
Oh....my mistake, I guess I wasn't paying attention. Thanks for the help!
uh oh
DXRACER Is better.
I feed my Endlers out of my hand and it's like getting them exfoliated as the little buggers keep "eating" long after the food is gone!
It does that sometimes. I'm not sure what's up with that.
This is great and I truly hope it comes to constructing a reading of a text which is consistent and realistic. He was lost too for all the other religion around the time of the cloning? He was telling stories and the looked up at the end of the movie, which is when Riddle tells him.
I don't know anything that could help you but im sorry that it's happening, hope you figure something out!
damn. the nitro update was a harsh era wasnt it? lol
youre mnissing the transcendence part though. if both characters were able to output 100% effective healing, Zen would be higher on average.  the problem being zen has very few chances to reach that maximum potential, hence lucio/ana out healing him more often.  Edit: to people arguing "well Zen never has the opportunity to max his healing realistically." I agree with you, however that's not the question at hand.  If you owned a Bugatti Veyron , and I asked you how fast that thing goes, do you:  A) quote the local speed limit.  B) tell me the top speed. 
&gt; Dude, even Twilight (book) is a better love story.  As far as I've heard, the actual books were just average teen love trash, nothing legitimately shit. The memes spawned from the movie. Which you could describe as "Edward having an orgasm from smelling a girl's hair across a room while the girl looks like she's about to cry any minute".
Don’t talk bad about my baby Virgil 
No I think it's more like  trump alone = god like  trump and GOP = Not god like  No wonder donnie says he wants to meet KJU, they both think they are gods as do their cult following.
Yeah just never watch again, k? 
Shhh, don't interfere with the 'shippost.
&gt; came to like it  That's called Stockholm syndrom
I'm so sorry. This is horrible.   Post this on realself "ask a doctor". https://www.realself.com/question/dissolve-botox  How many cc did she inject? It probably migrated.  I saw your pics - you're very pretty. It might just be swelling but no matter what, unfortunately you're probably not going to fix this in 3 days.   It's very unfortunate but you really don't look as bad as you think you do - more like you're holding a little water in your face.  I would contour your jaw with makeup and just wait for this to pass, then write a bad review. 
Hello,  It appears this post is not a progress pic, or you have not correctly titled your post.  Please see [this sticky post](https://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/88jgj4/from_now_on_only_progress_pics_are_allowed/) for more information   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/pics) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Sorry, your account is not yet old enough to post in /r/StreetFights. This subreddit only allows accounts that are older than three days to submit posts.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/StreetFights) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wow, really?
couple too many sody pops
It’s not an Apple thing. It’s a US law called the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act.   https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Children%27s_Online_Privacy_Protection_Act
ʎǝupʎs
but you are supposed to support them, so if one decides to make a move that he feels is best for him, that's fine.
yo uso namecheap, en su entonces era de las mejores opciones, ahora debe haber mejores
Random question: Are there even any Collosi to fight in the WoL campaign? Or do terrains have Goliath in the sc2 protoss campaign? I think most of the protoss enemies were Tal'Darim who didn't use colossi from what I remember.  Without the wings of liberty upgrade letting goliaths use both their missiles and their ground weapons at once, which do they use against colossi?
Bad idea CiG, i cant test nothing with this cost, i lose time farming money...and losing with crashs :(
Mauer would've scored if Sano did the same thing tho as long as they both ran on the wild pitch
beberapa anak2 fresh grad usia 22-24 di kantor saya tidak tahu beda margarin &amp; butter.   #pendidikanindonesiaeraSBYgagal
I knew someone that hadn't been out of London until he was 16. He thought we used a different currency in the rest of the country.
There was an economic recession in the marketplace this past week 
Why would you need a siren? It kills everyone on the enemy team regardless of location, so the siren wouldn't be useful.  It's not like you can find cover from that particular streak.
Lol so tell me why they don’t set up their own educational systems? Why do they have to rely on charity and missionaries genius? Do you have any evidence these killings are connected to Christianity in any way? 
Intermittent fasting, yes. That company doesn't sanction multi-day fasting (but in my other workplace that I own, I supervise multi-day fasts)
Cuz winding up with no subs is a lot less fun, than to lose your rock son, so flex seal your buns!
Good to know I'm not the only one who feels this way. This sub, Telegram, Twitter, etc are ghost towns compared to other projects. I am glad that there isnt any "When Moon?" , shilling airdrops, and ether swap scams being posted. I get plenty of that on my portfolio's other altcoins groups but I agree that some sort of pulse should be felt. I see the value and potential of the project. I don't need to be coddled or sold hype, I did my research, but some activity would be nice. My hold mantra through all of this has been that with Mobius's part in the IBM/Stellar ecosystem and the new merger with Maersk, they might be obligated to remain tight lipped. A lot of proprietary software, systems, and hardware is involved. I would imagine that trying to become the world's number one go to for shipping, logistics, and finance probably requires some discretion. They could also just be way too busy working. Either way that's the narrative I like and going with. The Mobius team doesn't owe myself and other investors anything thing  other than giving it the good old college try. But some community involvement would be nice.  Full disclosure, I did sell off some of my MOBI today at a loss to chase gains with another token. Hopefully my returns on that will be good enough to come back and reinvest with some more capital.  *Edit for missing word. On mobile.*
So did I.
I am so glad I never used facebook
I have been for the last few days. It's pretty cool. Don't really get the hate. It's a pretty cool community.
Dude had to feel the rope burn on his neck.
how many hours have you put in? im at 25! 
Rozier can ball man
This is an interesting opinion. Could you expand on why you believe it is failing?
Also look at Chain Strike. Only released 3 days ago
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gNsqVNqIGj4
Way to go!  My parents have always been very strict about their dogs' diets and if they gain a couple pounds they cut back food slightly for a couple weeks and up the walking. The vets always commend them even though neighbors want to slip their dogs treats.  It's so aggravating
Uploaded on the original message :)
I see a Jojoke, I upvote.
Did you check enhanced room rental in the mcm? 
Lol, I hate when the dps runs in and pulls agro and dies, then wonders what the hell the deal is and leaves group. Wait for the tank, ya numpty.
[Bias, huh?](https://www.yahoo.com/news/blogs/ticket/conservative-activist-green-name-gets-irs-stamp-approval-193457897.html)  The problem with your cited source is that they compare it to violent crime **in total** if you read closely. Not even gun crime. 
Hahah thanks!! It’s the NZXT s340
Cara eu sinceramente não me acho tão importante pra ter meus dados monitorados pela abin. Eu realmente não entendo toda esse drama com a privacidade também, é muito simples resolver, põe informação errada, só usa o seu nome verdadeiro, a quantidade de desinformação, mela qualquer tipo de investigação online.
I would love to pass it on. :) What were you looking for?
Doesn't surprise me.
My God how can you be so bored with such a beautiful body? You are quite a sight
Seen this before.
This game wasn’t over at halftime and isn’t over now. Should be good down the stretch
Yolo review. 
Holy cow!
Actually, the assumption is made that Christ was crucified on a Friday because the next day was the Sabbath. He was crucified on the Passover (the Passover began the evening of the institution of the Lord's Supper and continued through the next day for his trial and crucifixion). Christ claimed he would be in the ground three days like Jonah was in the belly of the whale- being crucified on Friday and being out by Sunday morning doesn't really meet that criteria. However, the day after Passover is the first day of the Feast of Unleavened Bread, and is a Sabbath no matter which day of the week it falls on (Leviticus 23:7). So Christ could have been crucified on Wednesday afternoon, spent Thursday, Friday, and Saturday in the ground, and been raised Sunday.
People who use Vegeta think he's cooler than Goku in the show.
Well i didnt mention marxism though. I'd have to agree on that point.
You write really well.
I use an app so it looks no different. Meh
It's a strange thing to happen. Not only did I have to buy an XL (I'm normally a large) but after a few months it m longer fit. I was not a happy bunny. 
Fuck off back to r/ShitLiberalsSay, tankie.
I hope English isn't your primary language because I could barely understand what you're trying to say. The person I was replying to stated, in Sadokist's defense, that he was insulting someone he was mad at. In my reply, I stated that if OP believed Sadokist was using the n-word as an insult, then that is racist.  For example, if I insulted you by calling you a piece of shit, it stands to reason that I believe the words "piece of shit" to be negative. And it is -- a piece of shit is smelly and disgusting.  So if Sadokist insulted someone by calling them the n-word, it stands to reason he believes that word to be negative. And if he believes being an n-word is a negative, he's likely racist.
chasers
Yeah, but if you wanna trash talk you gotta win something. Trash talking with no trophies is small baller stuff. Get a clue Vancouver. Love the city though. Love going there and hanging out. Very mild, no more riots. So no disrespect.
it would mean that Mauer would have advanced to third and then he would have scored on Sano's grounder, so yeah, it probably leads to another run.  EDIT: Alright, everyone, let's all explain this at once
To each their own, but I feel like that’s what JJ and crew were going for. She supposed to be old, ugly and unassuming.
Bradham chems to amazing hit power and blockshed while Lavonte David has pedestrian stats but ST. i’ve used both and like Bradham better but I think Brooks is better thab both (havent used Brooks tho)
Wow! That's a fun fact I didn't know. Her brother has one too. 
Sort of. We didn’t for our 2nd but with planning for a 3rd, our boys name was our other option for baby #2 (who is a boy). 
The reel rock videos are good too 
You can chain a bunch of mixers together no?  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FCpd6mkNWas
Gotta be honest you had me there for a few seconds. 
I disagree.  Meds have too many side effects to justify their wide spread use. yes they have some positive effects faster than therapy, but therapy should be the first line of defense instead of meds. 
That's what he meant 
Yeah, pretty much. People are stupid and I love pointing it out. Sometimes comments can get hundreds of points on alts, or sometimes they catch wind of people who think I'm trying too hard! Love it since I'm practically never wrong and only base arguments on facts. Pretty fun just seeing who catches up to it or not, it's my downtime.
&gt;implying that he has a girl
There is an intersection in my town where I notice people do this all the time.  When turning left they cut across the turning lane (like the woman did in the vide) all the time.  When ever I'm in that lane I have to make sure I sit way back to not get clipped.
I got a 6" foam queen mattress for a cheap furniture store, took the cover off it and cut to size with a kitchen knife.   It cost about 40% of what I would have paid at a foam place.
This guy drops the N word a lot^
Or any tribal spell with dinosaur as its subtype. Sadly tribal is kinda being phased out it seems
Can we at least agree that other star systems can't be Solar Systems?
Oh wow. 500hrs or so into skyrim and never considered this. I am using the "An alternate start" mod though, which varies things a bit
You're welcome.
Texas proms are all about gaudy decorations and dancing apparently. Most of what I’ve seen is they eat, go through a slideshow of memories that the class experienced, and then dancing and socializing. I went to two and they were both pretty fun even with my social anxiety lol.   Edit: my tip is to just let loose and enjoy it. I was kind of uptight during mine and never got a chance to goon around with my friends all in the same place again after. 
Well, as your new friend I need to confess that I downloaded a Kesha song last night and was pretty embarrassed but I still did it. It’s cool if you never speak to me again now. I get it....
Thanks for the chuckle.
Classic bro-phies choice
Thank you for your contribution to r/Steam, however your submission has automatically been removed for potentially violating the rules. A moderator will shortly review your submission.  Please do not send a modmail. **The moderators have been notified**.   Make sure you've read [our rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/steam/about/rules) and thank you for your patience!   ---   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Steam) if you have any questions or concerns.*
This Indian movie called Jagga Jasoos  Like look at the [trailer](https://youtu.be/xtm48kJwL1I) man  Oh fuck I thought this thread was asking for cinematic masterpieces sorry. But FR tho this is a good movie
Yeah, there's another promotion as well. 25% off any collectibles when you purchase a $5 tote and that stacks with the 30% off clearance.
Glad to have you, hope you have a blast here!
Ayy same. But it’s hard to find good macro stuff without vore 
l/nichtspassiertjemals
It flies great in 3.1 and was an absolute destructive force of nature in 2.6. I think all it really needs is a visual repass 
Holy Shot
At least they got that right. 
Their like vegans. They can't go 5 minutes without telling you about it.
Meta haters, the people that show up to events smelling like ass.(this applies to men and women, cuz I've seen or smelt many of women that decided to not shower before going to play) and lastly, people that complain that decks arnt fair when they are using a deck that was never good to begin with.
No, nigga why would I do that shit?
I dont think i like this whole "straighties" term. Guess im a special snowflake now.
THEY SCURRED TO PITCH TO FREDDIE NOW PUSSIES 
Again this is just my perspective and others may feel differently, but it made me feel like he was hypersexual and could not fathom that I needed a night or two off. If he were tired and needed to rest, I would not whip out a vibrator in front of him. It just seems taunting and violating if a person has made clear they are not feeling sexy, don't throw it in their face. I'm hoping this makes sense. It sounds like you're otherwise a very attentive partner.  
Especially when we just don't have those problems. People like to pretend we do, especially those who aren't Canadian, but really we don't have any of those issues.
There is no canon, because there is no truth to *any* of this. It is, by nature, fictional, and is therefore no more or less true (which is to say: canon) than any other piece of fiction.
Heavily involved. Excellent work rate as usual. Got into good positions but since he’s lacking in confidence, he lost the ball a couple times.   His assist was a simple pass across the box to lukaku, after receiving a through-ball. His goal was from a counter-attack, Lingard plays a through ball to Sanchez in the middle, behind the defence, he runs with it and finishes nicely to the left.   Too expensive atm as an FPL asset but watch out for his form leading into DGW37  **TL;DR he had a good performance today and after his goal I think his confidence will improve. Not worth price tag atm**
That's game.
I think he's saying that people who constantly talk about how great it is to be white and have a disdain for other races do so because they don't have anything else to be proud of. 
We are measuring stakes per week, not weeks per stake.  Stakes per week = #stakes / #weeks = 75 stakes / 104 weeks ~ **0.72 stakes every week**  Weeks per stake = #weeks / #stakes = 104 weeks / 75 stakes ~ **a new stake every 1.4 weeks**  Still probably rounds to double digits in Mormon Math.
My skis literally say “this is your left/right ski” on the top sheet. 
I 100% agree
Oopsie
A boy can dream!
I agree as well it’s pretty easy to counter and I’ve killed guys that used it because they had no clue I broke down the wall they were hiding behind and already sniped them
Ya it is 
C
Okay, I figured it out. You actually have to restart the game. I tried logging out of STW and logging back in but that didn't work. I lost my mind for a bit. I thought I got hacked or something. 
I meant in the Mythology. I believe Sigurd was the first son of Siegmund, and the brother of Siegfried.
Yeah.  So, I bought a used car and not a new one.  Well, I also own a 12 year old car as well.  It will have to last for quite a few more years too.  I chose to pay for dental care instead.  And got the better deal for it, as you well point out.  My choices are not my neighbour's responsibility to pay for, regardless.
This guy Polishes.
Nah thats like one of the coolest things about glass. Its one of the few mediums that you cant physically touch during  creation to manipulate it. You have to learn to use your tools as an extension of your hands, rather than using your hands as the tools
I like to pick a body part then spend 10 or 15 minutes focusing on it. For example, she wanted feet attention so I rubbed her feet and sucked her toes. I asked for inner thighs...she asked for breasts...I asked her balls...etc. And let me tell you...15 minutes of focused attention on my balls was amazing. 
^(Hi, I'm a bot for linking direct images of albums with only 1 image)  **https://i.imgur.com/Sd3noyn.jpg**  ^^[Source](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot) ^^| ^^[Why?](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot/blob/master/README.md) ^^| ^^[Creator](https://np.reddit.com/user/AUTplayed/) ^^| ^^[ignoreme](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=ignoreme&amp;message=ignoreme) ^^| ^^[deletthis](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=delet%20this&amp;message=delet%20this%20dwlqo88) 
The journey takes 2 hours and 20 minutes *one way*, plus time it takes between Narita airport - Tokyo train station, and Kyoto station to the hotel.  so it's pretty much impossible for her to get the passport and be on time for her plane.
Just be sure to remember to pick up every Pinnacle Gold you can find with it!
Fact
Custody almost automatically going to the mother. It hurts children, and can drive loving, caring dads to suicide.
Indeed. To them the only gender equality that matters is women and trans people. They have a huge "fuck men" attitude over there
Sweden? I'm guessing every car had 4 cylinders.
REEEEEEEEE
Well, it is certainly working with those that didn’t understand evolution in the first place. :-P
Not a dealer, but the word on the street is that the Camry can be had for around $5k off MSRP while there are few incentives for the Accord.  Camry sales are up around 12% while the accord is down.  There are already production shutdowns scheduled for the Accord because of there being too much inventory.   I think another issue is that the styling is pretty subjective.  The front end is polarizing and the rear is pretty boring.  I’m in the market for a midsize sedan and really want to like the Accord, but I find myself looking at the Camry.  It seems to be more car for the money even though I know the Accord would be more fun to drive.  If I do get a Honda, it’s likely to be a Civic SI.  The sedan market is down big time.  Manufacturers are competing for a shrinking pool of buyers, so I wonder why Honda still hasn’t put any incentives or lease deals on the Accord.  I think that’s the biggest issue why they’re not moving.
Hmm... I dont. 
The Pope has ran out of power?
Two hours tonight 4 yesterday afternoon found 1
Whoever did the leak has more integrity than all of them
Grandmothers are often from an era where you just let boys be boys. Just because they are tolerant of a thing doesn't make them right.
We are talking about the fastest characters as iida with its recipro burst, and Stain that has speed "s" according to the manga.
Bad offer. Davis has yet to hit, and the RBs aren't that great (we can't trust Baltimore on Collins' usage). You need to be picking up an actual starting player somewhere for Jones.
Akira walks over to Hana and gives her the "Grand sage-sama" Shirt with Akira's face on it.  "Would you like to wear this?"  /u/HH_Yuizaki 
I don't know that it really was at the cost of comfort, though. Maybe it just saved them money to do that and the cost was what sold best. They're not necessarily related. It wasn't like they *had* to lower their quality, like the consumers just forced their hand at gunpoint. 
That's what... she said?
This would also be propaganda, so the removal would remain.
&gt;It's one of the core observations of modern economics that wealth *is* created "out of thin air". There isn't a finite supply of wealth out there, and there is no law of conservation of wealth.  That is obviously not true. Economics study the distribution of scarce resources, if resources aren't scarce, there isn't any problem and everybody can have whatever they wish to have.  The Adele live show is expensive because there is only one Adele and it costs money to set up the infrastructure to a live show, you can't have the whole world watching Adele at the first row at the same time - you may stream it through the internet, record and make it available on spotify, etc. But only few people who decide to pay will be able to watch live in the first seats.  &gt; Because wealth is not oil and wealth is not food; wealth is, fundamentally, *satisfaction*. Oil and food can lead to wealth simply because those things satisfy someone's desires, but there are plenty of ways to create satisfaction that do not require raw materials.  Yes, it is. You can't sing for a handful of people and expect their hunger to cease. You can't sing to people in order to move them from home to work. If there is not enough food to feed everybody, some people will go hungry, there is no printing money that can change this reality.  Demand can be increased by printing money: you give people money and they buy stuff, creating incentives to a bigger production. But supply can't be increased by printing money. If you print too much money, supply won't be able to accompany and inflation will surge.
Finally... It was super frustrating watching them play so, *average* and still win game after game. 
I'm expecting to be disappointed. 
I don't understand anything Fenix does
[MonoShuga wrote on 2018-03-31 UTC](https://boards.na.leagueoflegends.com/en/c/skin-champion-concepts/AG42uPYG-candy-king-aurelion-sol-skin-model) with [link](https://twitter.com/MonoShuga/status/979924296620544001):   **Candy King Aurelion Sol Skin Model**  &gt;So in February I drew a Candy King design for Aurelion Sol and it got reposted in the boards here so I didn't bother to post it myself :'D &gt;But!!! I made a model for it,,,,, I'm really happy and I want people to see it,,, &gt;Aurelion Sol is my fave champ and I love him a lot,, &gt;A lot of people thought this skin concept was dumb and yeah I agree but I also think it fits with his personality as a grumpy sassy king,,,  a cupcake forger who created all candy (Or so he claims ;&gt; ) &gt;idk it's 5am and I'm making no sense haha &gt;I hope people like it though! &gt;{{champion:136}}  *****   ^This ^comment ^was ^created ^by ^a ^bot. ^Find ^out ^more ^[here](https://github.com/sufficiency/ribomic/blob/master/README.md).  
Shot to the heart.
He must only play crit riben
When’s game night?
the movie was seemingly written by reading the back of the book.
Fuck Facebook
I paid Heat, Slip, PolyPop &amp; Crim Wonders. Good deal or??
Gratz, I actually had no idea that you could get anything other than a silver.
Not crazy about the words in italics on the front page.  Those words look like they're supposed to be most important, but putting them in italics actually makes them smaller than the words around them.
I just bought my Roscoe a few weeks ago though!
Great tits Betty biggins
e ainda usa meme velho r/comedycemetery também
Part of it is for cnit176 I have to do a pi project anyways and clusters is one of them 
Willies hears ya...Willies doesn’t care. 
there you go 
Are there even self driving cars on the road?
Star players and elite prospects drive demand. That and pretty much never losing at home. There's only so many seats and there definitely isn't any room to install more.
Unfortunately my local location is all about the hipster fashion focus so I didn’t want to mess with that. The price point was my main issue, if they would have just started off with “wow, it’s embarrassing this ever left our shop I hope you give us a chance to make it right” and actually pretended to give a shit I would have probably let them alter it but the whole experience was really off putting.
Got a Kik?
Come back any time, a little friendly PvP is what the games about man.  Nothing wrong with a little friendly zvz'ing ;)
Until those players try out paper Magic. Then it’s just reinforcing bad habits.
Bippity boppity give me the zoppity
R
I think that jeep needs an electric tow truck and an electric cop to write him an electric ticket
Pretty sure that was the second time it became a point of emphasis.  Polian helped reduce it from a 10 yard to a 5 yard chuck.
15 Pcc For Black Dieci?
Reminds me of that one map on Left 4 Dead
https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC4244242/  This talks about how added sugars can contribute to heart disease (not necessarily the sole cause of HD) 
https://imgur.com/I2yFDuX
Have you even read this comment thread? You definitely are a twat by the way. It's not Russia versus Germany. That's irrelevant to the discussion. (But I do love how you hold it like its your trump card.) It's Russia versus America. After Germany invaded Russia. It seems ludicrous I have to spell this out for you but I'll do it anyway.  Things would not have ended well for Russia if she invaded western Europe immediately  after the second world war ended.   EDIT: I'm out of this. This is a dumb argument with dumb people. There is simply no way that Stalin is risking it for a biscuit. Those of you claiming he wasn't damaged by the Nazi invasion or could hold out against the Americans in time to make their own A-bombs are ignoring the obvious. There was nothing in Europe worth the bitter water of an inevitable American reprisal. 
If hi-rez keeps true to what they've said in season 3 about exclusive vs limited when it comes to "reward" skins. most if not all reward GOD SKINS will be exclusive, including oddy skins and season ticket ones.  The only reward items that will be possibly limited are reward jump stamps and music themes and hud themes and recall effects ect. along with assured limiteds being final collection rewards in events such as T5s in the oddy, and event skins like the final collection reward goobis from the birthday event.
Sarcasm, dude.  Sarcasm.
Other way around, IMO. f+2,2 should be used early to try and steal a STB charge. There's a ton of characters who have specialty punishes (and the occasional full launch) but overall risk vs reward, especially early in the game where there's no walls nearby, is super in Claudio's favor. Early STB against a character like Paul changes the dynamic tremendously.
Truth bombs through humor, my friend. Just doing my part to wake up the sheeple with funny jokes. 
2 terms   2 scoops   2 genders  MAGA
Yep but you have to go into settings to format the drive I believe 
Understandable as those are expensive cards. Do you have access to proxies in your playgroup?   I think teysa is viable as a fringe cEDH commander with a little luck. I would cut fatter stuff like necrotic sliver, liliana heretical healer, marsh flitter, tragic slip, sword of feast and famine, relentless dead, several lands, and damnation.  What's your gameplan? Seems like it is tutor up darkest hour, a free sac outlet, and an outlet for infinite sacs such as blood artist. The combo is a bit weak because its 3 pieces, but the plus side is that they are each pretty cheap mana wise and can provide multiple functions. For example, bitterblossom or bloodghast with contamination is a sweet softlock that provides you more turns to draw into your combo. Because you are going to be running a ton of free sac outlets, you may get more mileage out of hatebears, even ones that poorly interact with your board because you can sac them when you are ready to go off. I'd suggest both thalias, aven mindcensor, spirit of the labyrinth, eidolon of rhetoric, ethersworn canonist, and linvala keeper of silence to start. If you cut sun titan you can get mileage out of ad nauseum, the single more powerful draw spell in the format.   On the flip side, the other way to get your combo online faster is to have more sources of draw. Your teysa shell sets you up to easily abuse skullclamp so I'd run more tutors for it such as steelshaper's gift. Run some spot draw like night's whisper and sign in blood is never a bad choice if your mana base can afford it. You also dont have a ton of ways to remove hate artifacts/enchantments, which can ruin your day (rest in peace, null rod, stony silence, grafdigger's cage to a degree) so you may benefit from a simple disenchant or fragmentize. Aura of silence is a niche card but can turn off some combos such as bomberman and ruin doomsday and storm lines. Similarly with blind obedience 
https://imgur.com/a/gUdHC  Got this beauty today and an EBM evolve. How important is SC in mono WW frontline?
considering men often leave their wives for their mistresses, no.
Just finished Conquest today. Didn't encounter the bug
Horus?
Obvious horde bias /s
I'm not sure. I think it might count as importing. I'm not a lawyer.  Is it importing ~~of~~ if a non-commercial entity brings personal property into a state for non-commercial reasons?
Yo.  Just to say, not ignoring this comment, started reworking my setup thought I'd test a bit before responding but project got a bit out of hand. I now own a bunch more power tools lol.  Might start a thread about bigger setups, as you say there aren't that many of us running 4 sensor and bigger areas so limited info out there.  Anyway, new Constellation setup will be 11'x13'. That is the the corners where the sensors are. A distinction I see almost everyone blurring is sensor locations vs playspace. It's understandable but overlooks the extremities and they can be either irrelevant or critical depending on the use.  Regarding Lighthouse, they are definitely IR optical and LOS. Did not mean to imply otherwise, sorry if I gave that impression. On the occlusion issue; as they say in the aerospace industry "One test is worth a thousand theories"   .Basically I don't even remember the last time I thought "oh, occlusion" (vs shit wigging out ie same as my Rift). I'm going to examine that more closely with the new setup but my gut response as to why it's not really an issue is;  1. Doofus Donuts 2. Angles  Basically the sensor rings that stick up from the Vive wands are hard to occlude, and the 'overview' perspective of the view above the user.
Jesus Christ that's young.
Fun times
When I had my Fiat 500 Abarth(top of the line model) guys would come up bragging about beating my car in a race when they in fact "raced" a base model Fiat 500. big difference in the car, much like a base model mustand and a Shelby
We’re doomed. Solid works is a tool, a great one but you need real world hands on experience too.  But it’s cheaper and easier to sit a load of students if front of pcs than have to let them get their hands dirty.
yeah well you tell nansa that they can go away  from, me.
Peak clickbait is not knowing if your referring to the joke on the left or clickbaiter on right
but can juventus do it on a chilly evening in kyev?
Thanks!
...yet we are all still talking about just the puppy, so she’s not the most important part of the photo
u dumb lol
This T is scalding 
good luck, owner of that place is a huge cockhole.
Not in my good christian suburbs!
Thanks for everyone's response. Talking about this, even if it's with a bunch of strangers on reddit has been helpful.  
T
It does have a bunch of steps, but when I whip that skill out, people are impressed
Uploaded on the original message :)
Morneau is going to be doing broadcasts this year! Yes!!!
But the automation wasn't even really at fault in the last one in Arizona.  Many/Most drivers would have hit that lady even paying attention.  She crossed right in front of the car on a highway, outside of any crosswalk, at night, wearing dark clothes.  
Snapchat filters too.
Популизм в данном случае (и в целом в современном контексте) это скорее характеристика риторики кандидатов. Простые "решения" сложных проблем, раздачи хлеба и организация зрелищ и т.д.  Пока люди продолжают голосовать за кандидатов с харизмой и программой вида "вам все будет и ничего за это не будет", политики вроде Ляшко будут и дальше иметь нефиговый рейтинг.  А что касается "олигархических проектов" - без доступа к медиаресурсу на ТВ вы появитесь пару раз на каких-нибудь дебатах на UA:1 и все. Потому какой-либо рейтинг есть только у тех, кто договаривается.
Went to the bathroom and peed through my underwear just to see what would happen.  Peed on the couch because I didn't wanna get up.   Too young to remember this one but we were at a church picnic and I said our kid out of nowhere, "MY DAD HAS A BIG WEINER"   One time we lit my little ponies on fire in the house.   Smoked spice with out knowing.   Lawn mower was running and I put my hand by the blades to scoop out grass and didn't realize the horror until 5 min after. 
Return it then lol
DNM. Onions. There are ways my friend.  Look into it and be safe. You need to do a lot of research: Both in how to acquire it as safely as possible and how to use it as safely as possible. It's risky but it's worth it.
it looks more like loyola doesn't want loyola to win this game.  they are just throwing the ball away for the last 10 minutes.
http://library1.org/_ads/655EB51EF45D2BD986C1A48966135E8C
Welcome - do check out our Starter Kit if you haven't already (although I think you have): https://www.reddit.com/r/CSRRacing2/comments/74ixtn/averagenoobs_csr2_starter_kit/  Always good to know this place continues to help folks enjoy the game!
CLEARLY he's about to get touchy-touchy
Will “neelan” Nylander
&gt; I get this urge to reply, to say: you aren't telling everything, are you?  As the LL, I have to back space a lot. Or when people make generalized statements about LLs. I just leave the thread as opposed to arguing.  But your husband sounds like he was very, very damaged by his mother and his religious upbringing. That is very difficult to address, heal and reverse- but the first step there is acknowledging you are fucked up and people who are that controlling and religious often struggle to do that.
That's my feeing too. Back to the trolling too....if it was just someone with a disorder or whatsoever, they'd be trolling other missing persons cases too. Very strange. 
You can buy and sell the IR scope from skier and make a profit every time, hence you can have unlimited money. takes about 5 minutes to make a mill
Never, ever ship an item until your PayPal balance shows the payment has been applied to your account. An email means *nothing* and should be simply ignored.
Or 48 with one eighth a shoe?
Anyone else notice the guy walking in the lot to the left of the action? Doesn't even break his casual stride during all of the commotion. I'd have high tailed it away from there.
Here's some photos I took from \~11 miles away. My first time manually tracking and focusing, it was a challenge although looking forward to trying again.  [https://imgur.com/gallery/YeR4V](https://imgur.com/gallery/YeR4V)
Or you could get blackmailed like I am right now. That’s pretty cool
These refs are unashamedly biased towards Michigan 
Witch hunt inbound. Why is whaling even a thing anymore though? We can get everything they provide from other sources these days. Just let the poor things be.
Got through one sentence and knew what day it was.
You're welcome!
She never should've apologized for what she said. 
Doubtful there is a handicap modified Uber/Lyft around, but you might try an Uber XL if your friend can be be lifted out of a chair. Beyond that, I'd call the hospital and see what they recommend. There are transportation services that specialize in handicap here, but I don't have any personal experience with any. Maybe try one of the senior centers? Sorry I don't have a better suggestion.
Trying a different setup tonight - I'll do replays
NEE
Found the tranny!  You know what to do, boys!
Because often time being from or having ancenstry from a different place is interesting to other people. When I see people who are Hispanic I often ask them because I’m hoping to hear they are from Mexico because I’ve been and want to talk to someone about being from Mexico. When they are are Asian and I find out they are Chinese I’m excited to hear about their country because I’ve been a few times and can relate to them. When I travel abroad people always ask where I am from and I’m happy to tell them about it. I’ve never once assumed racism, just thought they were being friendly. 
I can't wait to be waterboarded
Your reason is not ethical, so it’s up to you if you want to live with it or not. Did you have an issue with his illegal activity before he dumped you?
Usually you need to post pictures of the blade open so we can see both sides
What side of town are you on?
That boy is scary!!
If this were the choices we had, Id either go Roquan Smith or Derwin James assuming we cant trade down.
what channel is the game on ?   i have comcast 
His finish product is shit, but his movement off the ball was on point. 
Sure, but I'm too tired for that right now. Tomorrow we'll analyze it. Promise.
I love this haha, just the idea of Beatle stan wars seems so bizarre but realistically would definitely happen if it was during todays time lol  "Ringo is a talentless flop" *gif of women sipping tea*  "hunny, no" *gif of ringo sipping tea* 
*ID: 344 397 166  *PLV: 243  *Notable Captain(s): Lucy, Neptune... A bunch of other legends too.  *Looking for: Anybody willing to play Johnny so I can get three gems from the Shells Town Mission, I have Yosaku.
Done all and profile
Animals know 
Ok I'm on, feel free to trade request me
I'm sure I'll get majorly down voted here but.... There's another option than spending $20k on veterinary care, and it's not pet insurance. 
You literally want me to go through film of shitty teams in early April, and look for them to dance infront of the crowd, and then show you film later in the year of that same team, not dancing...  do you realize how dumb that sounds?   Use the old noggin kiddo 
Yeah that's what I said. I was using the old exotics as an example of the roles the new ones could fill in. 
Ichiro also played better here than he ever did in Japan.
GOTTUM!!!!! FINALLY GOTTUM!!!!
You're nuts if you think forsberg was better than korpi. You cannot judge a goalie on spot starts that are as random as korpi gets. He's 23. He has great talent. Did korpi give up 2 soft goals? Yeah. But his defense didnt help him out at all this game either. To blame korpi solely for this loss is idiotic. 
wth. how is that even sanitary 
**All**:   Ay, marry, will we; therefore get ye gone.
Gotcha
Thank you, I try hard to keep the snark on point.
Although I didn't mean snob. My usage is a barbaric, slangy use of the word that I likely picked up from informal conversations in Asia. In this sense, it's used like a name calling shortcut to mean that the person snubs people (like when you're quickly gossiping and partly speaking in codes). Based on the official English definition and expected usage, "snub" is misused.
I'd "Yoast" you, but learn to write better Apu.
Omg noooo the final act was my shit.
Cherry never misses an opportunity to stroke his cock to Marchand 
Dude their year is minutes away from being over...
Please Loyola 
Is it possible to make problematic posts over a can registered to European countries to tie up police resources?
^(Hi, I'm a bot for linking direct images of albums with only 1 image)  **https://i.imgur.com/rq7t3mE.png**  ^^[Source](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot) ^^| ^^[Why?](https://github.com/AUTplayed/imguralbumbot/blob/master/README.md) ^^| ^^[Creator](https://np.reddit.com/user/AUTplayed/) ^^| ^^[ignoreme](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=ignoreme&amp;message=ignoreme) ^^| ^^[deletthis](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=imguralbumbot&amp;subject=delet%20this&amp;message=delet%20this%20dwlqoco) 
Exactly, he was a top 5 lock who's hype has suddenly been dwarfed by the hype of Derwin James. His lack of a true position is hurting his stock and real talk he projects best as a FS which simply aren't highly coveted in the early first. I don't expect him to be there at 13 but it's more likely in my opinion than Denzel Ward or Derwin James being there and they've both been consistently mocked behind him.   He's the most likely guy to fall of the Minkah, Nelson, Chubb group imo and the top comment shutting the talk down shows a regurgitation of major network pundits as opposed to actual draft research. 
Nah I think I'll keep these pearls away from the swine for now.
And if you are craving sushi, the meal plans come with a set amount of aggie cash, which can be used for other places on campus, one of which is sushi at the memorial union.  So you can always get sushi or something else around campus if you want a change from the dining commons food.   Also, you can look at this website to see what is on the menu at the dining commons, just to get an idea if how it looks: http://housing.ucdavis.edu/dining/menus/dining-commons/tercero/ There won't be anything on there today because of spring break, but tomorrow they should have next week's menu on there.  
Nice find the other 2 space skins have it as well they just don’t glow, got this skin the other day 👌👌👌
:)
If you're still interested, I'm selling a 500GB Samsung 850 Evo [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/hardwareswap/comments/88mst1/usama_h_used_items_ryzen_5_1600x_noctua_nhl12/). CDI and timestamps can be found there as well.
MAKE EM DANCE TERRY.
Je wilt je pot pindakaas niet bovenop je chips in de tas hebben. Daarom leg je de pindakaas eerst en de chips daarachter op de band. Als de kassamedewerker dan de pindakaas eerst pakt is dat frustrerend.
general rule of thumb: there *is no* secure email.  There are email extensions that nobody uses (GPG), and proprietary communication platforms carried over email (Proton, Tuta, etc.), but there is no generally interoperable and widely used secure email.  You *can* have fairly private email clients, these would be services that run plain old email but give you something from a privacy promise to technical measures to protect your messages, such as Kolab, the now-defunct Lavabit, Riseup, etc.  going one step down, you have just totally normal, not specifically privacy oriented, email services that just aren't google and don't actively mine your data.  however, even if you switched to one of them, [google will still have most of your emails anyway because they have all of your contacts' emails](https://mako.cc/copyrighteous/google-has-most-of-my-email-because-it-has-all-of-yours).  and then, there's the gigantic trade-off to moving away from google. not a single other mail client works as well as gmail. just to name some big ticket items: you will lose the superb spam filtering, you will lose conversation view, you will lose labels, you will lose extremely robust filters (although some services' filters are better at other things... like clear triggering hierarchy).  take my two deal-breakers: conversation view - the *only* other services i have seen that has this is Outlook.com and Fastmail. labels - not a single other client implements this, period. so when you're looking at a significantly degraded email client, for what? so that google can have half of all your emails instead of all of them, there's a real question of whether it's worth it.
I'd think if you truly supported Bernie you would gotten off your ass and voted to prevent the GOP from making SCOTUS picks.
Shit, Luxotica owns eye insurance plans and eyeglass stores.  You are actually pre-paying for your glasses/contacts every month, then buying them in a Luxotica store, and buying Luxotica manufactured frames.
Downvote the *picture* if you're tired of people stealing other people's original content
black mirror
ouch
I hope you can also support the palestinian cause more and be critical of your government, in your community as an israeli it can mean much.  Peace would be nice, it would be nice to do stuff together!!
Is zoology/animal science very impacted? I’m hoping to become a veterinarian but I know that I would never be accepted into a bio major, so I’m not sure what to apply for with my stats. 
"GGX NORMIES"... coming from a 50% youtube based community   Y I K E S   This is so dumb 
Got it, thank you so much! Both for the hatches and for your patience putting up with me and plaza!
That would be the most broken thing in the game. Love it.
Just use a regular android phone as a Hotspot. We've been doing this for months and it's absolutely wonderful if there is good reception where you are.  
Why do you go to the trouble of explaining how his head isn't really moving, but morphing the face position or whatever, then you suddenly declare that he can only move parts with joints? 
I've been working my way through, generally scoff at these kinds of lists,  but i figure it's a good jumping off point to experience some music outside my wheelhouse.   Loved machito, Miriam makeba,  the louvin bros (bluegrass album near the beginning), the Marty Robbins album was cheesy as he'll but fun and well done for all that,  I have kind of skipped around a bit, there's a couple of nice Indian (subcontinent) albums, and an album of northern african/Arab music that was very good (water from a distant well?).   The early rap and hip-hop stuff was about the time i was 20 and  I wasn't into it then,  so it was great to see what I was missing.
Eh, this is probably more wholesome anyways.
By the time that radios normally had aux or line in jacks, people were already looking to escape radio.  
Yeah, super cool till you lose your job over something like this. 
Even my non fallout playing friends like Big Iron. It's just a fantastic tune to play games to. 
Cool-I’ll msg u once we get things organized-I’m getting close to 16 ppl in this and may just go with that to make it quicker-I’ll msg u when we are ready to go.
" Only if you can show undue Hardship"  https://studentaid.ed.gov/sa/repay-loans/forgiveness-cancellation/bankruptcy  "What circumstances do I need to prove to have my loan discharged in bankruptcy? You must declare Chapter 7 or Chapter 13 bankruptcy and demonstrate that repayment would impose undue hardship on you and your dependents. This must be decided in an adversary proceeding in bankruptcy court. Your creditors may be present to challenge the request.  top How do bankruptcy courts determine undue hardship? The bankruptcy courts do not use a single test to determine undue hardship but may look at the following factors to determine whether requiring you to repay your loans would cause an undue hardship:  * If you are forced to repay the loan, you would not be able to maintain a minimal standard of living. * There is evidence that this hardship will continue for a significant portion of the loan repayment period. * You made good faith efforts to repay the loan before filing bankruptcy.  What happens to my loan if the bankruptcy court determines repayment would cause undue hardship? It depends on the terms of the bankruptcy court’s determination. The terms may include the following:  * Your loan may be fully discharged, and you will not have to repay any portion of your loan. All collection activity will stop. * Your loan may be partially discharged, and you will still be required to repay some portion of your loan. * You may be required to repay your loan, but with different terms, such as a lower interest rate.  *this dude is homeless and mentally ill.  I'd say he can show inability to even achieve a minimal standard of living and that it's likely to persist.  The only sticking point is good faith repayment....*
NP! :) 
The feeling of having to stack all day is what breaks him for me.  I don't like stacking, it feels like a chore, but at list for everybody else its just temporary, instead with Zhong You have to KEEP doing it and its annoying.
There's video of them firing on unarmed protestors while they were mid-prayer.
Is there a dedicated subreddit for development updates and discussion?
This helps a lot. Thanks. One more question. What does "on infantry" mean? Is that a PvP thing? I play PvE if that makes a difference.
That is very true. Unfortunately sometimes I get a bit too comfy with my nearly dead phone and the cable bends a bit too much. Especially after a bit of vermouth.
For those two minutes it was a triumph!
For the Love of ACT Science book: https://drive.google.com/file/d/0B8zWy2fcGeT9eGMtNlhBUjZRNEk/view It's very good.  Absorb all the knowledge in it and then grind UWorld/CrackACT
Not only that, the Disney Channel used to sometimes run them as a package deal too, back in the early 1990s.   The shorts were also all collected on a single VHS tape, and were later put on the DVD release of Who Framed Roger Rabbit as bonus features.
Flake I guess. Her email address didn't work, and she hasn't PM'ed me, so I don't know. Maybe her meds kicked in. Or maybe "they" caught her, who knows?
Good bot
wack
Nope
Does your family normally support and believe you, or is dismissing your feelings and chalking them up to chemical imbalances a pattern for them?  Call 1−800−799−7233. It's the national DV hotline. They can help.
I can't answer as to the misprint question, but no, Cheshire is confirmed not a trap.
Hello, /u/BQFC. Your submission has been automatically removed from /r/motorcycles because your account does not meet the minimum requirements to post videos.  Please participate in community discussion before submitting videos.  If you have any questions about this removal, please feel free to [message the moderators.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/motorcycles&amp;subject=Question regarding the removal of this submission by /u/BQFC&amp;message=I have a question regarding the removal of this submission: [New YouTube Channel]( https://www.reddit.com/r/motorcycles/comments/88mt13/new_youtube_channel/\))  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/motorcycles) if you have any questions or concerns.*
**Children's Online Privacy Protection Act**  The Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998 (COPPA) is a United States federal law, located at 15 U.S.C. §§ 6501–6506 (Pub.L. 105–277, 112 Stat. 2681-728, enacted October 21, 1998)  The act, effective April 21, 2000, applies to the online collection of personal information by persons or entities under U.S. jurisdiction about children under 13 years of age. It details what a website operator must include in a privacy policy, when and how to seek verifiable consent from a parent or guardian, and what responsibilities an operator has to protect children's privacy and safety online including restrictions on the marketing of those under 13.  While children under 13 can legally give out personal information with their parents' permission, many websites – particularly social media sites — disallow underage children from using their services altogether due to the cost and work involved in complying with the law.  ***  ^[ [^PM](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=kittens_from_space) ^| [^Exclude ^me](https://reddit.com/message/compose?to=WikiTextBot&amp;message=Excludeme&amp;subject=Excludeme) ^| [^Exclude ^from ^subreddit](https://np.reddit.com/r/apple/about/banned) ^| [^FAQ ^/ ^Information](https://np.reddit.com/r/WikiTextBot/wiki/index) ^| [^Source](https://github.com/kittenswolf/WikiTextBot)   ^] ^Downvote ^to ^remove ^| ^v0.28
Do a fast from caffeine for at least a week or two before the race. So when you inevitably use caffeine during the race it'll be more useful. 
when they kind and funny
The claim was:  &gt; A Continent of Europoors - what it says about Europe when one of its richest members, France is worse off than Alabama while Italy is worse off than every single American state, including Mississippi 😰  The claim was not that the GDP per person is higher in the USA than in Europe.  These countries have in common that they are all in Europe.
Wait you can get straight honey at micky Ds?
Uploaded on the original message :)
Wow, I was certainly not aware of this school...and I never considered any type of reserve branch. Thank you very much for taking the time to respond, this was extremely helpful. 
*You dreamed about what? You're crazy! Next!*
&gt; Under Stalin, USSR/Russia couldn't even defeat Finland! While bloodthirsty is perhaps the best adjective to describe him, I think incompetent is a close second.  But they did defeat the Nazis, so there was that. They also went from Feudal to a nuclear power that was on the brink of being the first space fairing nation ever. So, while murderous, incompetent isn't a good word for them.
Tengo una en la frente a lo harry potter porque me cai de chiquito (no pun intended) en el aeropuerto y me abri la cabeza como huevo kinder. Igual a mis 20 pico ya no se nota tanto. 
/r/shittyHDR written all over that picture
This is my hat now! This is totally my hat!
Nice dude, I wouldn’t have started if it wasn’t for my friend telling me to go after shinnies. 
Nice That is my husband's birthday! :) I expect my period April 11th-ish, but I will be starting on birth control then for suppression for about 2 weeks. 
I would take a korean winter over summer any day. The summer is hot moist hell. 
I’m an alpha in official pvp chill with vVv and some others if ya want u can build with us
That’s what happens when they use a novideo GPU smh r/AyyMD
Doesn't make you weird man. I'm a gay guy that enjoys watching straight couples bang. Doesn't mean i'm going to go out and find myself a lady. Maybe it's just the intimacy that turns you on as opposed to the fact that it's two guys.   On another note i'd be pretty happy if one my straight male friends helped me out in this fashion every now and then haha.
&gt;Ik ben een beetje in de war, waarom is het kwalijk dat in een opinieartikel over de politiek een opinie is verkondigd?  Creatieve interpretatie. De oorzaak voor die verwarring ligt bij jezelf, nergens staat ook maar de suggestie dat meningen een kwalijk iets zouden zijn. Ik vind de eenzijdige belichting in dit opiniestuk een kwalijke zaak.   &gt;Het artikel vecht duidelijk tegen het beeld dat geschept wordt van een “islamisering” die Nederlandse tradities om zeep helpt, waarom is het dan van belang dat Denk en Bij1 daarmee genoemd zouden moeten worden? Hebben zij voorstellen gemaakt op basis van de Islam om paaseieren te hernoemen? Zijn ze tegen Kerst omdat het onislamitisch is?  Migrantenpartijen komen op voor de belangen van hun achterban. Deze achterban is niet-westers en niet-Christelijk. Een politieke partij zal zijn standpunten als het even kan positief verwoorden, dus termen als 'afschaffing' of 'verbod' zul je niet snel lezen. Echter, als de discussie zich aandient dan zullen deze partijen een voorkeur hebben voor 'nieuwe' feestdagen die tegemoetkomen aan de data waarop de religieuze of culturele tradities van het electoraat plaatsvinden.   Een SGP wilt evenwel een zondagrust waarbij elke ondernemer de deuren moet sluiten. Omgekeerd zie je een partij als NIDA die streeft naar 'nieuwe' feestdagen zoals tijdens het offerfeest. [Link](http://www.nidarotterdam.nl/onze-oproep/standpunten/).
17-2, ouch
There are constant debates about that sort of thing on this sub. I front load my IRA, but am more than happy to get the full match from my employer. Throwing away a guaranteed x% is not a good idea for someone that is passively planning for retirement
Quagan blowup sex toys
https://thebaffler.com/salvos/all-politics-is-local-stan
In the US, when you're convinced of a felony, you're stripped of your citizenship. This makes it legal to enslave you.  Source: Felon and former slave, currently in possession of a Vital Document entitled: Restoration of Citizenship
No problem!  Good luck.  I hope it works out for you. 
I can already validate that wanting sexual gratification is my problem. While some people say it’s toxic masculinity, It’s honestly something all guys feel left out on. It can be something that gets worse as time gets on. I’m just recognizing that I’m the problem. 
Farfan should get an honorable mention 
Time for you to put a spare phone in the room and record what's being said and/or get video if you can. Then send to family, if you really think they'll never believe you.
I have to say I agree now. I read up on the discussion/drama as of late and had noidea how much cash some individuals put out in attempts to win. I can see your point now and well yeah if im dropping a pretty penny id rather see whats on the menu first then form a plan.  Im not a huge watch enthusiast so there are only few watches im looking for. It helps in that there isnt a continous amount of watches I enter a raffle for. In a diffrrent perspective, if I had a limited budget and entered a good amount of raffles then Id totally side with you. 
u/Green_lives_matter nice deflection there. we all know you're the one selling black slaves in libya
You could also do this with any sauce you can't fit in the bottle too. Perfect use for those extra bits!
Check out /r/dontfundme. Half of it is gofundme pages of people who want to travel on someone else's dime. And really think they deserve it.
Oslo
I practiced on my American Girl doll long before I started doing it on myself. It also helped a lot that my hair was very long and I didn't have layers as a kid. Now I could never do it because my hair is too short and the layers would slip right out. It's been a long time since I tried, but I remember that lying down and resting my head at the very edge of the bed with my hair hanging down helped.
Favorite active YouTube contributer. 
Sometimes I find the game doesn't properly refocus when tabbing back but it normally gets fixed just by tabbing out and back in again.
Freddie "Free" Walkman
I've done a grapefruit IPA with juniper and Simcoe. Pretty close!
Buen intento pero no se puede dar vuelta la humillación que te dieron.
Stream?
Loyola subbed in a bunch of kids from St Mary's School for the Blind
Just read all the comments that basically say "but Obama......" because they are too dense to even know what the post is saying. That's how we got here. And don't get me wrong, the left has their share of morons too,
I have a friend who links me weird or sexually suggestive anime games every time one pops up on Steam all like "only in Japan".  I then google the developer. 9 times out of 10 they are a Western studio.
TRANSLATION: MY SON HAS SHITTY GRADES
PSA: Titanfall 2 is a amazing game! Amazing combat, amazing campaign, amazing multiplayer!  All of the Titans feel unique, and there is definitely one that appeals to your play style.  Pick it up.
Its already dead
The Bioshock Collection. Infinite is truly incredible.  It's one of my all-time favorites.  
The host who played Peter Abernathy in the pilot episode has 35 years of important data in his brain that Delos Inc. wants.  Now, Charlotte Hale is looking for him because he disappeared from cold storage.
And throw fruit at them. 
google voice or any other VoIP provider
Yeah I play guitar and ukulele. I can come up with decent fun chord progressions on it, but not anything I can put with the lyrics I write. I absolutely can't write anything for shit on the guitar.
I can see it, now that you mention it.  Think they're just shirts though ;)
How do I Yield in metric? 
[Oh ReEeaAAlyyyy?](https://i.imgur.com/lLzEbxp.jpg)
I'll add that too. I have it.  34 epsidoes total. 13, 14 &amp; 7 consecutively
YuK
My friends are absolute idiots and we are all seniors in HS, but if you want I’ll invite you to our discord  Edit: This offer goes out to everyone who wants to join. 
it'll depend on the strain.  Some strains will have a standard ratio that is quite different then what is purchased or is in your plant.
This hits too real of a level for me.  Mainly from the heads making a heart, This has so much meaning.
Maybe it makes your enemies rat out your other enemies?
Who made ants? I have to go with pokemon the first movie 
sent :)
Not a great rhyme. Small boots.
LT
To be honest, I always felt like they should have made him the Hobgoblin. I know it wouldn’t be accurate to the comics in the slightest, but comics Harry had twenty-some years to make the Green Goblin role his own. Movie Harry did not. Taking on the Hobgoblin persona would give him his own identity (without putting him on a fucking skateboard) while still highlighting his connection to his father.  I dunno, I mostly just hate having to call him “New Goblin.”
Double ungood.
&gt;many liberals still don't understand the importance of judicial appointments  I've never noticed any appreciable difference between the two parties on that front. There were plenty of Democrats saying people should vote Clinton because of the courts.
Nobody loves Kanye like Kanye loves Kanye 
No she can't.
I completely disagree. I never ask what someone else is laughing at as I am not one to pry. I figure if it’s something they want to show me they will, if not, its something they think I won’t find funny or something they find funny and think its weird they find it funny or an inside joke etc 
This person gets it. By max rank you'll throw them so far that by the time they get back to you it'll be off cooldown again. So just keep trying until you throw them somewhere they can't walk back from. 
metro is one of my idles bro, tell me if issa metro beat https://soundcloud.com/banz0/30-bands
Run the launcher as Admin.  That error often means the patcher is having problems modifying files. 
likewise - I (and many coworkers of mine) have weekend hours though. I'd love it if we could make these week-long bursts followed by a huge rush on saturdays.
Lol I’m just waiting for the day I do this 😝😝 luckily my normal time isn’t usually too packed so I could probably still squeeze in but still 😜
As a fellow Rider and sneaker head, I'm glad to hear you're ok my man! 
Selliing 154 sweatcoins for $7!
Oh my god it's 8:00 and it's only the 2nd.
WHY ARE YOU FORCING ME TO WORK FOR AK PLZ MAKE ME SPAWN WITH ONE I PAID FOR THE GAME!
Looks like Snoopy there. 
See you later, space robro.
**This is an automated message posted to all posts in this subreddit with some basic information about the group including (very importantly)  rules.  Why are you getting this message?  Most people seem to not read the sidebar for information or the rules, so it is now being posted under all posts.** **Confused about acronyms or terminology?** [Click here!](https://www.reddit.com/r/raisedbynarcissists/wiki/acronyms)  **Need info or resources?**  Check out our [Helpful Links](https://www.reddit.com/r/raisedbynarcissists/wiki/helpfullinks) for information on how to deal with identify theft, how to get independent of your n-parents, how to apply for FAFSA, how to identify n-parents and SO MUCH MORE!  This is a reminder to all participants, RBN is a support group that is moderated very strictly.  Please report inappropriate content so it can be reviewed by the mods.  **Our rules include (but are not limited to)**:  * No politics. * Advising anyone in this subreddit to commit suicide or referring anyone to groups that advocate this will result in     an immediate ban. * Be nice. No personal attacks, name calling, or bullying. [No slurs] (https://www.reddit.com/r/raisedbynarcissists/wiki/slurs) or victim-blaming. * Do not derail the posts of others. * Narcissists are NOT allowed to post or comment here. * [Please refrain from posting "uplifting" threads](https://www.reddit.com/r/raisedbynarcissists/wiki/upliftingposts). * When you comment/post, assume a context of abuse. * No asking or offering gifts, money, etc. * No content advocating violence, revenge, murder (even in jest). * No content about N-kids. * No diagnosis by media/drive-by diagnosis. * No linking to Facebook pages. * No direct linking to anywhere on reddit. * No pure image posts.   **For a full list of our rules/more information, [**click here**](https://www.reddit.com/r/raisedbynarcissists/wiki/rules).**   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/raisedbynarcissists) if you have any questions or concerns.*
The Queen of England controls the US Social Security System? Whaaat? 
Scary Terry hoodies and tees have been out of stock for ages!
Don't jinx it for me.
https://m.glossybox.com/?gclid=EAIaIQobChMIvMK3reGX2gIVSpN-Ch0Nkg4xEAAYASAAEgJBT_D_BwE&amp;gclsrc=aw.ds  Effaclar Towelettes Oil Free Face Wipes  Rituals Foaming Shower Gel
All hail our benevolent Jagex overlords! Without Treasure Hunter, who knows where this game would be
Watch it, smoothskin
It could be if the alarm is close to the furnace, natural gas could set it off.  You'd usually smell that though.
A guy started at my work a few months ago, he was from Germany, and had to come here so he could actually get a job
Thanks 
Vromance - [Star](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WdVXgRifwY0)   This MV totally enhanced the song, it made it so much more emotional and mesmerizing. The storytelling through choreography is just so amazing and it was done wonderfully for this song which made it have a lasting impact for me (add this with their vocals and GOD this song is good).
That's my best guess too, but I cant help but think of it in terms of that old debate about whether representatives should go by their personal feelings or by what they think the voters want. Like maybe this is all part of some cold realpolitic calculation about what it takes to win a Democratic primary in her district. Or, perhaps, it is her own personal indulgence she feels is safe thanks to all her other positions which make her indispensable to that lobby. Is she cosplaying as a genius or sincerely being a nerd?  Or what if it's some entirely separate issue like maybe one of her most vital supporters or staffers drew a hard line on that one issue or something. It could be decided on the basis of something like that.  Either way, the enigma she represents is less important than the question of who ought to replace her, but I'd still like to know just what in the fuck is going on there.
Uploaded on the original message :)
Fusionfall would like to have a word with you
Shit whoops, didn’t see the other Q. what’s the plan?
It's not true as someone who was around at that time. Like no set was going to be seen as good because mirrodin fucked everything up so bad but kamigawa did everything wrong. Even the block/draft format sucked ass. 
Totally my dude
Is there actually talk about Chris pratt doing it?
If this isn’t the dumbest shit I’ve read all day
I can see you being upset about the CPU/GPU debacle.. But you can't be upset about GMN/MN holders not being able to obtain reward pools.. The road map CLEARLY has a month between the time the parent chain would be released and when the MN would come online.   This means Main net would go live, and MN would be irrelevant on reward pools until a month later. Sounds like you didn't understand that.
And close doors in the small houses
What a handsome little man oof
Don't these people know it's Holy Week? The Catholics have to win.
That's really concerning 
I'm not seeing the difference.
Where wtf
Probably because people forget what they learned in school, not because the big bad white man is trying to keep the black history down. 
Have you ever actually had it? The Icelanders said it's not very good. Which makes sense, if it was delicious people would eat it where it's available. I didn't try it because it was only at fairly trashy restaurants. I bet you're just trying to be edgy. 
Thank you, phychedrnd, for voting on sneakpeekbot. This bot wants to find the best and worst bots on Reddit. [You can view results here](https://goodbot-badbot.herokuapp.com/).  *** ^^Even ^^if ^^I ^^don't ^^reply ^^to ^^your ^^comment, ^^I'm ^^still ^^listening ^^for ^^votes. ^^Check ^^the ^^webpage ^^to ^^see ^^if ^^your ^^vote ^^registered!
I feel like IO's farm priority might change if he got an AOE perma stun at level 25.
That's easily fixed tho. https://getprivacy.net/configuring-your-browser/#protecting-against-webrtc-leaks
Like others said, you have a time limit, but it's also worth mentionning that what he did to go up there is pretty hard to do without a timer, so I can't imagine doing this with a timer.
Thanks. I don't get why all the info about the ranked changes and everything I read says it's where you end and not your highest rank.  Like Brode's video even says it. Did that get changed?
The Abwehr was actually the intelligence agency for the Wehrmacht (german military), the Nazi party actually had a separate intelligence agency within the SS called the SD.
Phone running slick and smooth now! Battery been great too. 
I don't see it for me besides the sidebar info
I don't eat fish, the toxins...
Quake is best imo. Can stomp most without true strike once you’re good with her. Depends how much practice you’re willing to put in with her
I wondered that too. What I know is that Meri does well selling LuLaRoe clothing as a top consultant. Robyn sells the jewelry line "My Sister Wife's Closet." I think Janelle does real estate and has her "Strive With Janelle" workout brand. I really don't know what Christine does for any money. I believe they all do instagram or twitter sponsorships.  I once heard the show paid for their houses, I don't know if that is true. But they do get paid for being on the show. They might pool together the money from the show to pay for maintaining everything and have their own side things as their own personal income.  Another thing I've heard of is fundamentalist communities using government assistance programs. Where a sister-wife that isn't the legal first wife will claim herself as a single mother to [collect welfare.](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/who-foots-bill-for-polygamist-communities/) Legally they are single mothers, but it is taxpayers who have to pay for children by a man with multiple families. 
Cytunwyd.
Oh I agree but when maximizing to get most and still be under build limit a "surge" trap will do 30% more and hit a 3x3 area with similar reload.  And "shooting down the tunneL" most damage effective way to utilize darts. Launcher will push the "trouble mobs" back husk/minis are not a big concern. Thus launcher pushes problem mobs back under gas trap that does 3 times as much damage as darts per tick (4-5ticks) and stays active for full second.   Not saying they are as bad as tire traps but they need significant boost to be competitive when competing for build limit or tunnel spots. 
"buy when blood is in the streets"
Darigan Ukali!  Thanks for the opportunity! :D
